Egyptians - Wikipedia
Jump to content Main menu Main menu move to sidebar hide Navigation Main page Contents Current events Random article About Wikipedia Contact us Donate Contribute Help Learn to edit Community portal Recent changes Upload file Search Search Create account Log in Personal tools Create account Log in Pages for logged out editors learn more Contributions Talk Contents move to sidebar hide Top 
1 Terminology 
2 Demographics 
3 History Toggle History subsection 
3.1 Ancient Egypt 
3.2 GraecoRoman period 
3.3 Islamic period from Late antiquity to Middle Ages 
3.4 Ottoman period 
3.5 Modern history 

3.5.1 Nationalism 

3.5.2 Liberal age 

3.5.3 Republic 
4 Languages 
5 Identity Toggle Identity subsection 
5.1 Ancient Egypt 
5.2 Egypt and Africa 
5.3 Islamic era 
5.4 Modern period 
5.5 Nasserism 
6 Culture 
7 Surnames 
8 Genetic and biological history 
9 See also 
10 References 
11 Bibliography 
12 Further reading Toggle the table of contents Egyptians 41 languages Afrikaans    Bosanski Deutsch  Esperanto Euskara  Franais  Hausa  Hrvatski Bahasa Indonesia    Latvieu Lietuvi   Bahasa Melayu   Ozbekcha   Portugus Romn  Shqip Simple English Slovenina   srpski Srpskohrvatski     Trke  Ting Vit  Edit links Article Talk English Read Edit View history Tools Tools move to sidebar hide Actions Read Edit View history General What links here Related changes Upload file Special pages Permanent link Page information Cite this page Get shortened URL Download QR code Wikidata item Printexport Download as PDF Printable version In other projects Wikimedia Commons From Wikipedia the free encyclopedia Ethnic group This article is about the contemporary Nile Valley ethnic group. For other uses see Egyptian disambiguation. For information on the population of Egypt see Demographics of Egypt. Egyptians Total population 120 million 20231 Regions with significant populations Egypt 109000000 2023 estimate12 Saudi Arabia 29000003 United States 1000000150000045 Libya 100000062000000 pre20117 United Arab Emirates 7500003 Jordan 600000316000008 Kuwait 5000003 Sudan 5000009 Qatar 2300003 Italy 14032210 Canada 7325011 Israel 5750012 Oman 560009 Lebanon 400009 South Africa 400009 United Kingdom 3900013 Australia 3653214 Germany 3250515 Greece 2900016 Netherlands 2840017 Austria 1593918 France 1500019 Iraq 1471020 Sweden 884620 Yemen 771020 South Sudan 500016 Morocco 200016 Japan 200016 Tunisia 100016 Mali 100016 Languages Majority Arabic mainly Egyptian Arabic Minority Coptic Religion Majority Islam predominantly Sunni Minority Christianity predominantly Coptic Related ethnic groups Afroasiaticspeaking peoples Egyptians Arabic  romanized Miriyyn IPA msrjjun Egyptian Arabic  romanized Mariyyn IPA msjjin Coptic  romanized remenkhmi are an ethnic group21 native to the Nile Valley in Egypt. Egyptian identity is closely tied to geography. The population is concentrated in the Nile Valley a small strip of cultivable land stretching from the First Cataract to the Mediterranean and enclosed by desert both to the east and to the west. This unique geography has been the basis of the development of Egyptian society since antiquity. The daily language of the Egyptians is a continuum of the local varieties of Arabic the most famous dialect is known as Egyptian Arabic or Masri. Additionally a sizable minority of Egyptians living in Upper Egypt speak Saidi Arabic. Egyptians are predominantly adherents of Sunni Islam with a Shia minority and a significant proportion who follow native Sufi orders.22 A considerable percentage of Egyptians are Coptic Christians who belong to the Coptic Orthodox Church whose liturgical language Coptic is the most recent stage of the ancient Egyptian language and is still used in prayers along with Egyptian Arabic. Terminologyedit Egyptians have received several names  rm n Km.t the native Egyptian name and description of the Black Soil of the Nile Valley. In antiquity23 The name is vocalized as rmenkmi  in the late Bohairic Coptic stage of the language during the GrecoRoman era. nirmenkmi  with the plural definite article Black Lands. Egyptians from Greek  Aiguptioi from  Aiguptos. Prominent Ancient Greek Geographer Strabo provided a folk etymology stating that  had evolved as a compound from A  Aegaeou huptis meaning Below the Aegean. In English the noun Egyptians appears in the 
14 th century in Wycliffs Bible as Egipcions. Copts  qib qub also a derivative of the Greek word  Aiguptios Egypt Egyptian that appeared under Muslim rule when it overtook Roman rule in Egypt. The term referred to the Egyptian locals to distinguish them from the Arab rulers. Coptic was the language of the Christian church and people24 but lost its popularity to Arabic after the Muslim conquest.2526 Islam became the dominant religion centuries after the Muslim conquest in Egypt. This is due to centuries of conversion from Christianity to Islam. The modern term then became exclusively associated with Egyptian Christianity and Coptic Christians who are members of the Coptic Orthodox Church or Coptic Catholic Church. References to native Muslims as Copts are attested until the Mamluk period.27 Masryeen Egyptian Arabic  romanized Mariyyn28 the modern Egyptian Arabic name which comes from the ancient Semitic name for Egypt. The term originally connoted Civilization or Metropolis.29 Classical Arabic Mir Egyptian Arabic Mar is directly cognate with the Biblical Hebrew Mitsrym    meaning the two straits a reference to the predynastic separation of Upper and Lower Egypt. Also mentioned in several Semitic languages as Mesru Misir and Masar. The term Misr in Arabic refers to Egypt but sometimes also to the Cairo area30 as a consequence and because of the habit of identifying people with cities rather than countries i.e. Tunis capital of Tunisia Tunsi. The term Masreyeen originally referred only to the native inhabitants of Cairo or City of Misr before its meaning expanded to encompass all Egyptians. Edward William Lane writing in the 18
20 s said that the native Muslim inhabitants of Cairo commonly call themselves ElMareeyeen Ewlad Mar lit. Children of Masr and Ahl Mar lit. The People of Masr.31 He also added that the Ottoman rulers of the region stigmatized the people of Egypt with the name AhlFarn or the People of the Pharaoh.32 Demographicsedit Main article Demographics of Egypt A map of Egypts population density. A view of Cairo the largest city in Africa and the Middle East. The Cairo Opera House bottomright is the main performing arts venue in the Egyptian capital. There are an estimated 1
05.3  million Egyptians.33 Most are native to Egypt where Egyptians constitute around 
99.6  of the population.34 Approximately 8490 of the population of Egypt are Muslim adherents and 1015 are Christian adherents 1015 Coptic Christian 1 other Christian Sects mainly Greek Orthodox according to estimates.3536 Most of Egypts people live along the banks of the Nile River and more than twofifths of the population lives in urban areas. Along the Nile the population density is one of the highest in the world in excess of 5000 persons per square mile 1900 personskm2 in a number of riverine governorates. The rapidly growing population is young with roughly onethird of the total under age 15 and about threefifths under 30. In response to the strain put on Egypts economy by the countrys burgeoning population a national family planning program was initiated in 1964 and by the 19
90 s it had succeeded in lowering the birth rate. Improvements in health care also brought the infant mortality rate well below the world average by the turn of the 
21 st century. Life expectancy averages about 72 years for men and 74 years for women.37 Egyptians also form smaller minorities in neighboring countries North America Europe and Australia. Egyptians also tend to be provincial meaning their attachment extends not only to Egypt but to the specific provinces towns and villages from which they hail. Therefore return migrants such as temporary workers abroad come back to their region of origin in Egypt. According to the International Organization for Migration an estimated 
2.7  million Egyptians live abroad and contribute actively to the development of their country through remittances US
7.8  billion in 2009 circulation of human and social capital as well as investment. Approximately 70 of Egyptian migrants live in Arab countries 923600 in Saudi Arabia 332600 in Libya 226850 in Jordan 190550 in Kuwait with the rest elsewhere in the region and the remaining 30 are living mostly in Europe and North America 318000 in the United States 110000 in Canada and 90000 in Italy.38 Their characteristic rootedness as Egyptians commonly explained as the result of centuries as a farming people clinging to the banks of the Nile is reflected in sights sounds and atmosphere that are meaningful to all Egyptians. Dominating the intangible pull of Egypt is the ever present Nile which is more than a constant backdrop. Its varying colors and changing water levels signal the coming and going of the Nile flood that sets the rhythm of farming in a rainless country and holds the attention of all Egyptians. No Egyptian is ever far from his river and except for the Alexandrines whose personality is split by looking outward toward the Mediterranean the Egyptians are a hinterland people with little appetite for travel even inside their own country. They glorify their national dishes including the variety of concoctions surrounding the simple bean. Most of all they have a sense of allencompassing familiarity at home and a sense of alienation when abroad ... There is something particularly excruciating about Egyptian nostalgia for Egypt it is sometimes outlandish but the attachment flows through all Egyptians as the Nile through Egypt.39 A sizable Egyptian diaspora did not begin to form until well into the 19
80 s when political and economic conditions began driving Egyptians out of the country in significant numbers. Today the diaspora numbers nearly 4 million 2006 est.40 Generally those who emigrate to the United States and western European countries tend to do so permanently with 93 and 
55.5  of Egyptians respectively settling in the new country. On the other hand Egyptians migrating to Arab countries almost always only go there with the intention of returning to Egypt virtually none settle in the new country on a permanent basis.41 Prior to 1974 only few Egyptian professionals had left the country in search for employment. Political demographic and economic pressures led to the first wave of emigration after 1952. Later more Egyptians left their homeland first after the 1973 boom in oil prices and again in 1979 but it was only in the second half of the 19
80 s that Egyptian migration became prominent.41 Egyptian emigration today is motivated by even higher rates of unemployment population growth and increasing prices. Political repression and human rights violations by Egypts ruling rgime are other contributing factors see Egypt  Human rights. Egyptians have also been impacted by the wars between Egypt and Israel particularly after the SixDay War in 1967 when migration rates began to rise. In August 2006 Egyptians made headlines when 11 students from Mansoura University failed to show up at their American host institutions for a cultural exchange program in the hope of finding employment.42 Egyptians in neighboring countries face additional challenges. Over the years abuse exploitation andor illtreatment of Egyptian workers and professionals in the Arab states of the Persian Gulf Iraq and Libya have been reported by the Egyptian Human Rights Organization43 and different media outlets.4445 Arab nationals have in the past expressed fear over an Egyptianization of the local dialects and culture that were believed to have resulted from the predominance of Egyptians in the field of education46 see also Egyptian Arabic  Geographics. A Newsweek article in 2008 featured Egyptian citizens objecting to a prudish Saudization of their culture due to Saudi Arabian petrodollarflush investment in the Egyptian entertainment industry.47 Twice Libya was on the brink of war with Egypt due to mistreatment of Egyptian workers and after the signing of the peace treaty with Israel.48 When the Gulf War ended Egyptian workers in Iraq were subjected to harsh measures and expulsion by the Iraqi government and to violent attacks by Iraqis returning from the war to fill the workforce.49 Historyedit Main article Population history of Egypt Further information History of Egypt Ancient Egyptedit Main articles Ancient Egypt and History of ancient Egypt People of the Black Lands in hieroglyphs Ancient Egypt saw a succession of thirty dynasties spanning three millennia. During this period Egyptian culture underwent significant development in terms of religion arts language and customs. Egypt fell under Hyksos rule in the Middle Bronze Age. The native nobility managed to expel the conquerors by the Late Bronze Age thereby initiating the New Kingdom. During this period the Egyptian civilization rose to the status of an empire under Pharaoh Thutmose III of the 
18 th Dynasty. It remained a superregional power throughout the Amarna Period as well as during the 
19 th and 
20 th dynasties the Ramesside Period lasting into the Early Iron Age. The Bronze Age collapse that had afflicted the Mesopotamian empires reached Egypt with some delay and it was only in the 
11 th century BC that the Empire declined falling into the comparative obscurity of the Third Intermediate Period of Egypt. The 
25 th Dynasty of Nubian rulers was again briefly replaced by native nobility in the 
7 th century BC and in 525 BC Egypt fell under Persian rule. Egypt fell under Greek control after Alexander the Greats conquest in 332 BC. The Late Period of ancient Egypt is taken to end with his death in 323 BC. The Ptolemaic dynasty ruled Egypt from 305 BC to 30 BC and introduced Hellenic culture to Egyptians. 4000 Celtic mercenaries under Ptolemy II had even attempted an ambitious but doomed coup dtat around the year 270 BC.citation needed Throughout the Pharaonic epoch viz. from 2920 BC to 525 BC in conventional Egyptian chronology divine kingship was the glue which held Egyptian society together. It was especially pronounced in the Old Kingdom and Middle Kingdom and continued until the Roman conquest. The societal structure created by this system of government remained virtually unchanged up to modern times.50 The role of the king was considerably weakened after the 
20 th Dynasty. The king in his role as Son of Ra was entrusted to maintain Maat the principle of truth justice and order and to enhance the countrys agricultural economy by ensuring regular Nile floods. Ascendancy to the Egyptian throne reflected the myth of Horus who assumed kingship after he buried his murdered father Osiris. The king of Egypt as a living personification of Horus could claim the throne after burying his predecessor who was typically his father. When the role of the king waned the country became more susceptible to foreign influence and invasion. The attention paid to the dead and the veneration with which they were held were one of the hallmarks of ancient Egyptian society. Egyptians built tombs for their dead that were meant to last for eternity. This was most prominently expressed by the Great Pyramids. The ancient Egyptian word for tomb pr n means House of Eternity. The Egyptians also celebrated life as is shown by tomb reliefs and inscriptions papyri and other sources depicting Egyptians farming conducting trade expeditions hunting holding festivals attending parties and receptions with their pet dogs cats and monkeys dancing and singing enjoying food and drink and playing games. The ancient Egyptians were also known for their engaging sense of humor much like their modern descendants.51 Another important continuity during this period is the Egyptian attitude toward foreignersthose they considered not fortunate enough to be part of the community of rm or the people i.e. Egyptians. This attitude was facilitated by the Egyptians more frequent contact with other peoples during the New Kingdom when Egypt expanded to an empire that also encompassed Nubia through Jebel Barkal and parts of the Levant. The Egyptian sense of superiority was given religious validation as foreigners in the land of TaMeri Egypt were anathema to the maintenance of Maata view most clearly expressed by the admonitions of Ipuwer in reaction to the chaotic events of the Second Intermediate Period. Foreigners in Egyptian texts were described in derogatory terms e.g. wretched Asiatics Semites vile Kushites Nubians and Ionian dogs Greeks. Egyptian beliefs remained unchallenged when Egypt fell to the Hyksos Assyrians Libyans Persians and Greekstheir rulers assumed the role of the Egyptian Pharaoh and were often depicted praying to Egyptian gods. The ancient Egyptians used a solar calendar that divided the year into 12 months of 30 days each with five extra days added. The calendar revolved around the annual Nile Inundation akh.t the first of three seasons into which the year was divided. The other two were Winter and Summer each lasting for four months. The modern Egyptian fellahin calculate the agricultural seasons with the months still bearing their ancient names in much the same manner. The importance of the Nile in Egyptian life ancient and modern cannot be overemphasized. The rich alluvium carried by the Nile inundation was the basis of Egypts formation as a society and a state. Regular inundations were a cause for celebration low waters often meant famine and starvation. The ancient Egyptians personified the river flood as the god Hapy and dedicated a Hymn to the Nile to celebrate it. km.t the Black Land was as Herodotus observed the gift of the river. GraecoRoman periodedit Main articles Ptolemaic Kingdom and Egypt Roman province Ancient Egyptian portrait of an Egyptian mummy from the Fayum collection c. AD 125  AD 150 When Alexander died a story began to circulate that Nectanebo II was Alexanders father. This made Alexander in the eyes of the Egyptians a legitimate heir to the native pharaohs.52 The new Ptolemaic rulers however exploited Egypt for their own benefit and a great social divide was created between Egyptians and Greeks.53 The local priesthood continued to wield power as they had during the Dynastic age. Egyptians continued to practice their religion undisturbed and largely maintained their own separate communities from their foreign conquerors.54 The language of administration became Greek but the mass of the Egyptian population was Egyptianspeaking and concentrated in the countryside while most Greeks lived in Alexandria and only few had any knowledge of Egyptian.55 The Ptolemaic rulers all retained their Greek names and titles but projected a public image of being Egyptian pharaohs. Much of this periods vernacular literature was composed in the demotic phase and script of the Egyptian language. It was focused on earlier stages of Egyptian history when Egyptians were independent and ruled by great native pharaohs such as Ramesses II. Prophetic writings circulated among Egyptians promising expulsion of the Greeks and frequent revolts by the Egyptians took place throughout the Ptolemaic period.56 A revival in animal cults the hallmark of the Predyanstic and Early Dyanstic periods is said to have come about to fill a spiritual void as Egyptians became increasingly disillusioned and weary due to successive waves of foreign invasions.57 When the Romans annexed Egypt in 30 BC the social structure created by the Greeks was largely retained though the power of the Egyptian priesthood diminished. The Roman emperors lived abroad and did not perform the ceremonial functions of Egyptian kingship as the Ptolemies had. The art of mummy portraiture flourished but Egypt became further stratified with Romans at the apex of the social pyramid Greeks and Jews occupied the middle stratum while Egyptians who constituted the vast majority were at the bottom. Egyptians paid a poll tax at full rate Greeks paid at halfrate and Roman citizens were exempt.58 The Roman emperor Caracalla advocated the expulsion of all ethnic Egyptians from the city of Alexandria saying genuine Egyptians can easily be recognized among the linenweavers by their speech.59 This attitude lasted until AD 212 when Roman citizenship was finally granted to all the inhabitants of Egypt though ethnic divisions remained largely entrenched.60 The Romans like the Ptolemies treated Egypt like their own private property a land exploited for the benefit of a small foreign elite. The Egyptian peasants pressed for maximum production to meet Roman quotas suffered and fled to the desert.61 The cult of Isis like those of Osiris and Serapis had been popular in Egypt and throughout the Roman Empire at the coming of Christianity and continued to be the main competitor with Christianity in its early years. The main temple of Isis remained a major center of worship in Egypt until the reign of the Byzantine emperor Justinian I in the 
6 th century when it was finally closed down. Egyptians disaffected and weary after a series of foreign occupations identified the story of the mothergoddess Isis protecting her child Horus with that of the Virgin Mary and her son Jesus escaping the emperor Herod.62 Consequently many sites believed to have been the resting places of the holy family during their sojourn in Egypt became sacred to the Egyptians. The visit of the holy family later circulated among Egyptian Christians as fulfillment of the Biblical prophecy When Israel was a child then I loved him and called my son out of Egypt Hosea 111. The feast of the coming of the Lord of Egypt on June 1 became an important part of Christian Egyptian tradition. According to tradition Christianity was brought to Egypt by Saint Mark the Evangelist in the early 
40 s of the 
1 st century under the reign of the Roman emperor Nero. The earliest converts were Jews residing in Alexandria a city which had by then become a center of culture and learning in the entire Mediterranean oikoumene. A CopticArabic manuscript Ayyubid period AD 124950. Images depict Jesus in the Garden of Gethsemane the kiss of Judas the arrest of Christ his appearance before Caiaphas Peters denial at cockcrow Christ before Pilate and the baptism of Jesus in the Jordan River. St. Mark is said to have founded the Holy Apostolic See of Alexandria and to have become its first Patriarch. Within 50 years of St. Marks arrival in Alexandria a fragment of New Testament writings appeared in Oxyrhynchus Bahnasa which suggests that Christianity already began to spread south of Alexandria at an early date. By the midthird century a sizable number of Egyptians were persecuted by the Romans on account of having adopted the new Christian faith beginning with the Edict of Decius. Christianity was tolerated in the Roman Empire until AD 284 when the Emperor Diocletian persecuted and put to death a great number of Christian Egyptians.63 This event became a watershed in the history of Egyptian Christianity marking the beginning of a distinct Egyptian or Coptic Church. It became known as the Era of the Martyrs and is commemorated in the Coptic calendar in which dating of the years began with the start of Diocletians reign. When Egyptians were persecuted by Diocletian many retreated to the desert to seek relief. The practice precipitated the rise of monasticism for which the Egyptians namely St. Antony St. Bakhum St. Shenouda and St. Amun are credited as pioneers. By the end of the 
4 th century it is estimated that the mass of the Egyptians had either embraced Christianity or were nominally Christian.63 The Catachetical School of Alexandria was founded in the 
3 rd century by Pantaenus becoming a major school of Christian learning as well as science mathematics and the humanities. The Psalms and part of the New Testament were translated at the school from Greek to Egyptian which had already begun to be written in Greek letters with the addition of a number of demotic characters. This stage of the Egyptian language would later come to be known as Coptic along with its alphabet. The third theologian to head the Catachetical School was a native Egyptian by the name of Origen. Origen was an outstanding theologian and one of the most influential Church Fathers. He traveled extensively to lecture in various churches around the world and has many important texts to his credit including the Hexapla an exegesis of various translations of the Hebrew Bible. At the threshold of the Byzantine period the New Testament had been entirely translated into Coptic. But while Christianity continued to thrive in Egypt the old pagan beliefs which had survived the test of time were facing mounting pressure. The Byzantine period was particularly brutal in its zeal to erase any traces of ancient Egyptian religion. Under emperor Theodosius I Christianity had already been proclaimed the religion of the Empire and all pagan cults were forbidden. When Egypt fell under the jurisdiction of Constantinople after the split of the Roman Empire many ancient Egyptian temples were either destroyed or converted into monasteries.64 One of the defining moments in the history of the Church in Egypt is a controversy that ensued over the nature of Jesus which culminated in the final split of the Coptic Church from both the Byzantine and Roman Catholic Churches. The Council of Chalcedon convened in AD 451 signaling the Byzantine Empires determination to assert its hegemony over Egypt. When it declared that Jesus was of two natures embodied in his person the Egyptian reaction was swift rejecting the decrees of the council as incompatible with the Miaphysite doctrine of Coptic Orthodoxy. The Copts upholding of the Miaphysite doctrine against the proChalcedonian Greek Melkites had both theological and national implications. As Coptologist Jill Kamil notes the position taken by the Egyptians paved the way for the Coptic church to establish itself as a separate entity...No longer even spiritually linked with Constantinople theologians began to write more in Coptic and less in Greek. Coptic art developed its own national character and the Copts stood united against the imperial power.65 Islamic period from Late antiquity to Middle Agesedit Tomb of Egyptian saint DhulNun alMisri AD 796859 in Cairos City of the Dead. Before the Muslim conquest of Egypt the Byzantine Emperor Heraclius was able to reclaim the country after a brief Persian invasion in AD 616 and subsequently appointed Cyrus of Alexandria a Chalcedonian as Patriarch. Cyrus was determined to convert the Egyptian Miaphysites by any means. He expelled Coptic monks and bishops from their monasteries and sees. Many died in the chaos and the resentment of the Egyptians against their Byzantine conquerors reached a peak.66 Meanwhile the new religion of Islam was making headway in Arabia culminating in the Muslim conquests that took place following Muhammads death. In AD 639 the Arab general Amr ibn alAs marched into Egypt facing off with the Byzantines in the Battle of Heliopolis that ended with the Byzantines defeat. The relationship between the Greek Melkites and the Egyptian Copts had grown so bitter that most Egyptians did not put up heavy resistance against the Arabs.67 The new Muslim rulers moved the capital to Fustat and through the 
7 th century retained the existing Byzantine administrative structure with Greek as its language. Native Egyptians filled administrative ranks and continued to worship freely so long as they paid the jizya poll tax in addition to a land tax that all Egyptians irrespective of religion also had to pay. The authority of the Miaphysite doctrine of the Coptic Church was for the first time nationally recognized.68 According to alYaqubi repeated revolts by Egyptian Christians against the Muslim Arabs took place in the 
8 th and 
9 th centuries under the reign of the Umayyads and Abbasids. The greatest was one in which disaffected Muslim Egyptians joined their Christian compatriots around AD 830 in an unsuccessful attempt to repel the Arabs.68 The Egyptian Muslim historian Ibn Abd alHakam spoke harshly of the Abbasidsa reaction that according to Egyptologist Okasha ElDaly can be seen within the context of the struggle between proud native Egyptians and the central Abbasid caliphate in Iraq.69 The form of Islam that eventually took hold in Egypt was Sunni though very early in this period Egyptians began to blend their new faith with indigenous beliefs and practices that had survived through Coptic Christianity. Just as Egyptians had been pioneers in early monasticism so they were in the development of the mystical form of Islam Sufism.70 Various Sufi orders were founded in the 
8 th century and flourished until the present day. One of the earliest Egyptian Sufis was DhulNun alMisri i.e. DhulNun the Egyptian. He was born in Akhmim in AD 796 and achieved political and social leadership over the Egyptian people.71 DhulNun was regarded as the Patron Saint of the Physicians and is credited with having introduced the concept of Gnosis into Islam as well as of being able to decipher a number of hieroglyphic characters due to his knowledge of Coptic.72 He was keenly interested in ancient Egyptian sciences and claimed to have received his knowledge of alchemy from Egyptian sources.73 AlAzhar Mosque founded in AD 970 by the Fatimids Mosque of Abu Haggag built in the 
11 th century over the ruins of a pharaonic temple. The ancient Opet festival associated with this temple is mirrored in the present day festival of Abul Haggag celebrated similarly by boat processions through the streets of Luxor.74 In the years to follow the Arab occupation of Egypt a social hierarchy was created whereby Egyptians who converted to Islam acquired the status of mawali or clients to the ruling Arab elite while those who remained Christian the Copts became dhimmis but the Egyptians who converted to Islam were also called Copts until the Mamluk period.27 In time the power of the Arabs waned throughout the Islamic Empire so that in the 
10 th century the Turkish Ikhshids were able to take control of Egypt and made it an independent political unit from the rest of the empire. Egyptians continued to live socially and politically separate from their foreign conquerors but their rulers like the Ptolemies before them were able to stabilize the country and bring renewed economic prosperity. It was under the Shiite Fatimids from the 
10 th to the 
12 th centuries that Muslim Egyptian institutions began to take form along with the Egyptian dialect of Arabic which was to eventually slowly supplant native Egyptian or Coptic as the spoken language. AlAzhar was founded in AD 970 in the new capital Cairo not very far from its ancient predecessor in Memphis. It became the preeminent Muslim center of learning in Egypt and by the Ayyubid period it had acquired a Sunni orientation. The Fatimids with some exceptions were known for their religious tolerance and their observance of local Muslim Coptic and indigenous Egyptian festivals and customs. Under the Ayyubids the country for the most part continued to prosper. The Mamluks of Egypt AD 12581517 as a whole were some of the most enlightened rulers of Egypt not only in the arts and in providing for the welfare of their subjects but also in many other ways such as efficient organisation of law and order and postal services and the building of canals roads bridges and aqueducts.75 Though turbulent often treacherous and brutal in their feuds and politically and economically inept the later Mameluks maintained the splendour and artistic traditions of their predecessors. The reign of Kait Bey 14681496 was one of high achievement in architecture showing great refinement of taste in the building of elegant tombs mosques and palaces. It was a period in which learning flourished. By the 
15 th century most Egyptians had already been converted to Islam while Coptic Christians were reduced to a minority.7677 The Mamluks were mainly ethnic Circassians and Turks who had been captured as slaves then recruited into the army fighting on behalf of the Islamic empire. Native Egyptians were not allowed to serve in the army until the reign of Mohamed Ali. Historian James Jankwoski writes Ultimately Mamluk rule rested on force. The chronicles of the period are replete with examples of Mamluk violence against the indigenous population of Egypt...From horseback they simply terrorized those lesser breeds who crossed their paths. The sudden and arbitrary use of force by the government and its dominant military elite frequent resort to cruelty to make a point ingenious methods of torture employed both for exemplary purpose and to extract wealth from others all these measures were routine in the Mamluk era. Egypt under the Mamluks was not a very secure place to live.78 Ottoman periodedit Egyptians under the Ottoman Turks from the 
16 th to the 
18 th centuries lived within a social hierarchy similar to that of the Mamluks Arabs Romans Greeks and Persians before them. Native Egyptians applied the term atrak Turks indiscriminately to the Ottomans and Mamluks who were at the top of the social pyramid while Egyptians most of whom were farmers were at the bottom. Frequent revolts by the Egyptian peasantry against the OttomanMamluk Beys took place throughout the 
18 th century particularly in Upper Egypt where the peasants at one point wrested control of the region and declared a separatist government.79 The only segment of Egyptian society which appears to have retained a degree of power during this period were the Muslim ulama or religious scholars who directed the religious and social affairs of the native Egyptian population and interceded on their behalf when dealing with the TurkoCircassian elite. It is also believed that during the late periods of the Ottoman era of Egypt native Egyptians were allowed and required to join the army for the first time since the Roman period of Egypt including Coptic Christians who were civil servants at the time of Mohammed Ali Pasha. From the Egyptian side literary works from both the Mamluk and Ottoman eras indicate that literate Egyptians had not totally submerged their identity within Islam but retained an awareness of Egypts distinctiveness as a uniquely fertile region of the Muslim world as a land of great historical antiquity and splendor... At least for some Egyptians the land of Egypt aldiyar almisriyya was an identifiable and emotionally meaningful entity within the larger Muslim polity of which it was now a province.80 Modern historyedit Main articles History of Egypt under the Muhammad Ali dynasty and History of modern Egypt Battle of the Pyramids by FranoisLouisJoseph Watteau 17981799 Modern Egyptian history is generally believed to begin with the French expedition in Egypt led by Napoleon Bonaparte in 1798. The French defeated a Mamluk era army at the Battle of the Pyramids and soon they were able to seize control of the country. The French occupation was shortlived ending when British troops drove out the French in 1801. Its impact on the social and cultural fabric of Egyptian society however was tremendous. The Egyptians were deeply hostile to the French whom they viewed as yet another foreign occupation to be resisted. At the same time the French expedition introduced Egyptians to the ideals of the French Revolution which were to have a significant influence on their own selfperception and realization of modern independence. When Napoleon invited the Egyptian ulama to head a Frenchsupervised government in Egypt for some it awakened a sense of nationalism and a patriotic desire for national independence from the Ottomans. In addition the French introduced the printing press in Egypt and published its first newspaper. The monumental catalogue of Egypts ecology society and economy Description de lgypte was written by scholars and scientists who accompanied the French army on their expedition. The withdrawal of French forces from Egypt left a power vacuum that was filled after a period of political turmoil by Mohammed Ali an Ottoman officer of Albanian ethnicity. He rallied support among the Egyptians until he was elected by the native Muslim ulama as governor of Egypt. Mohammed Ali is credited for having undertaken a massive campaign of public works including irrigation projects agricultural reforms and the cultivation of cash crops notably cotton rice and sugarcane increased industrialization and a new educational systemthe results of which are felt to this day.81 In order to consolidate his power in Egypt Mohammed Ali worked to eliminate the TurkoCircassian domination of administrative and army posts. For the first time since the Roman period native Egyptians filled the junior ranks of the countrys army. The army would later conduct military expeditions in the Levant Sudan and against the Wahabis in Arabia.81 Many Egyptians student missions were sent to Europe in the early 
19 th century to study at European universities and acquire technical skills such as printing shipbuilding and modern military techniques. One of these students whose name was Rifaa etTahtawi 18011873 was the first in a long line of Egyptian intellectuals that started the modern Egyptian Renaissance. Nationalismedit Rifaa elTahtawi 18011873 laid the groundwork for the modern Egyptian Renaissance. The period between 1860 and 1940 was characterized by an Egyptian nahda renaissance or rebirth. It is best known for the renewed interest in Egyptian antiquity and the cultural achievements that were inspired by it. Along with this interest came an indigenous Egyptcentered orientation particularly among the Egyptian intelligentsia that would affect Egypts autonomous development as a sovereign and independent nationstate.82 The first Egyptian renaissance intellectual was Rifaa elTahtawi who was born in the village of Tahta in upper Egypt. In 1831 Tahtawi undertook a career in journalism education and translation. Three of his published volumes were works of political and moral philosophy. In them he introduces his students to Enlightenment ideas such as secular authority and political rights and liberty his ideas regarding how a modern civilized society ought to be and what constituted by extension a civilized or good Egyptian and his ideas on public interest and public good.82 Tahtawi was instrumental in sparking indigenous interest in Egypts ancient heritage. He composed a number of poems in praise of Egypt and wrote two other general histories of the country. He also cofounded with his contemporary Ali Mubarak the architect of the modern Egyptian school system a native Egyptology school that looked for inspiration to medieval Egyptian scholars like Suyuti and Maqrizi who studied ancient Egyptian history language and antiquities.83 Tahtawi encouraged his compatriots to invite Europeans to come and teach the modern sciences in Egypt drawing on the example of Pharaoh Psamtek I who had enlisted the Greeks help in organizing the Egyptian army.citation needed Egyptian silk weavers during the reign of Khedive Ismail 1880. Among Mohammed Alis successors the most influential was Ismail Pasha who became khedive in 1863. Ismails reign witnessed the growth of the army major education reforms the founding of the Egyptian Museum and the Royal Opera House the rise of an independent political press a flourishing of the arts and the inauguration of the Suez Canal. In 1866 the Assembly of Delegates was founded to serve as an advisory body for the government. Its members were elected from across Egypt including villages which meant that native Egyptians came to exert increasing political and economic influence over their country.84 Several generations of Egyptians exposed to the ideas of constitutionalism made up the emerging intellectual and political milieu that slowly filled the ranks of the government the army and institutions which had long been dominated by an aristocracy of Turks Greeks Circassians and Armenians.citation needed Ismails massive modernization campaign however left Egypt indebted to European powers leading to increased European meddling in local affairs. This led to the formation of secret groups made up of Egyptian notables ministers journalists and army officers organized across the country to oppose the increasing European influence.85 When the British deposed Ismail and installed his son Tawfik the now Egyptiandominated army reacted violently staging a revolt led by Minister of War Ahmed Orabi who was a rural Egyptian born in a village in Zagazig selfstyled elMasri the Egyptian against the Khedive the TurkoCircassian elite and the European stronghold. The revolt was a military failure and British forces occupied Egypt in 1882. Technically Egypt was still part of the Ottoman Empire with the Mohammed Ali family ruling the country though now with British supervision and according to British directives. The Egyptian army was disbanded and a smaller army commanded by British officers was installed in its place. Liberal ageedit Main article Liberalism in Egypt Mustafa Kamil 18741908 an anticolonial nationalist famous for coining the phrase If I had not been an Egyptian I would have wished to become one. Egyptian selfgovernment education and the continued plight of Egypts peasant majority deteriorated most significantly under British occupation. Slowly an organized national movement for independence began to form. In its beginnings it took the form of an Azharled religious reform movement that was more concerned with the social conditions of Egyptian society. It gathered momentum between 1882 and 1906 ultimately leading to a resentment against European occupation.86 Sheikh Muhammad Abduh the son of a Delta farmer who was briefly exiled for his participation in the Orabi revolt and a future Azhar Mufti was its most notable advocate. Abduh called for a reform of Egyptian Muslim society and formulated the modernist interpretations of Islam that took hold among younger generations of Egyptians. Among these were Mustafa Kamil and Ahmed Lutfi elSayed the architects of modern Egyptian nationalism. Mustafa Kamil had been a student activist in the 18
90 s involved in the creation of a secret nationalist society that called for British evacuation from Egypt. He was famous for coining the popular expression If I had not been an Egyptian I would have wished to become one. Egyptian nationalist sentiment reached a high point after the 1906 Dinshaway Incident when following an altercation between a group of British soldiers and Egyptian farmers four of the farmers were hanged while others were condemned to public flogging. Dinshaway a watershed in the history of Egyptian anticolonial resistance galvanized Egyptian opposition against the British culminating in the founding of the first two political parties in Egypt the secular liberal Umma the Nation 1907 headed by Ahmed Lutfi elSayed and the more radical proIslamic Watani Party National Party 1908 headed by Mustafa Kamil. Lutfi was born to a family of farmers in a village in the Delta province of Daqahliya in 1872. He was educated at alAzhar where he attended lectures by Mohammed Abduh. Abduh came to have a profound influence on Lutfis reformist thinking in later years. In 1907 he founded the Umma Party newspaper elGarida whose statement of purpose read ElGarida is a purely Egyptian party which aims to defend Egyptian interests of all kinds.87 Both the People and National parties came to dominate Egyptian politics until World War I but the new leaders of the national movement for independence following four arduous years of war in which Great Britain declared Egypt a British protectorate were closer to the secular liberal principles of Ahmed Lutfi elSayed and the Peoples Party. Prominent among these was Saad Zaghloul who led the new movement through the Wafd Party. Saad Zaghloul was born in a small Egyptian village he held several ministerial positions before he was elected to the Legislative Assembly and organized a mass movement demanding an end to the British Protectorate. He garnered such massive popularity among the Egyptian people that he came to be known as Father of the Egyptians. When on March 8 1919 the British arrested Zaghloul and his associates and exiled them to Malta the Egyptian people staged their first modern revolution. Demonstrations and strikes across Egypt became such a daily occurrence that normal life was brought to a halt.88 The Wafd Party drafted a new Constitution in 1923 based on a parliamentary representative system. Saad Zaghloul became the first popularly elected Prime Minister of Egypt in 1924. Egyptian independence at this stage was provisional as British forces continued to be physically present on Egyptian soil. In 1936 the AngloEgyptian Treaty was concluded. New forces that came to prominence were the Muslim Brotherhood and the radical Young Egypt Party. In 1920 Banque Misr Bank of Egypt was founded by Talaat Pasha Harb as an Egyptian bank for Egyptians only89 which restricted shareholding to native Egyptians and helped finance various new Egyptianowned businesses. King Farouk I Queen Farida and their firstborn daughter Princess Ferial c. 1940. Under the parliamentary monarchy Egypt reached the peak of its modern intellectual Renaissance that was started by Rifaa elTahtawi nearly a century earlier. Among those who set the intellectual tone of a newly independent Egypt in addition to Muhammad Abduh and Ahmed Lutfi elSayed were Qasim Amin Muhammad Husayn Haykal Taha Hussein Abbas elAkkad Tawfiq elHakeem and Salama Moussa. They delineated a liberal outlook for their country expressed as a commitment to individual freedom secularism an evolutionary view of the world and faith in science to bring progress to human society.90 When Egyptian novelist and Nobel Prize laureate Naguib Mahfouz died in 2006 many Egyptians felt that perhaps the last of the Greats of Egypts golden age had died. In his dialogues with close associate and journalist Mohamed Salmawy published as Mon gypte Mahfouz had this to say Egypt is not just a piece of land. Egypt is the inventor of civilisation ... The strange thing is that this country of great history and unsurpassed civilisation is nothing but a thin strip along the banks of the Nile ... This thin strip of land created moral values launched the concept of monotheism developed arts invented science and gave the world a stunning administration. These factors enabled the Egyptians to survive while other cultures and nations withered and died ... Throughout history Egyptians have felt that their mission is to tend to life. They were proud to turn the land green to make it blossom with life. The other thing is that Egyptians invented morality long before the major religions appeared on earth. Morality is not just a system for control but a protection against chaos and death ... Egypt gave Islam a new voice. It didnt change the basic tenets of Islam but its cultural weight gave Islam a new voice one it didnt have back in Arabia. Egypt embraced an Islam that was moderate tolerant and nonextremist. Egyptians are very pious but they know how to mix piety with joy just as their ancestors did centuries ago. Egyptians celebrate religious occasions with flair. For them religious festivals and the month of Ramadan are occasions to celebrate life.91 Republicedit The Free Officers Movement overthrew the Egyptian monarchy. The bottom row from left to right includes the Gamal Abdel Nasser the movements operational leader and Egypts second president Muhammad Naguib Egypts first president Abdel Hakim Amer and Anwar Sadat Egypts third president Over 2 million Egyptians protesting in Tahrir Square Increased involvement by King Farouk in parliamentary affairs government corruption and the widening gap between the countrys rich and poor led to the eventual toppling of the monarchy and the dissolution of the parliament through a coup dtat by a group of army officers in 1952. The Egyptian Republic was declared on June 18 1953 with General Muhammad Naguib as the first President of the Republic. After Naguib was forced to resign in 1954 and later put under house arrest by Gamal Abdel Nasser the real architect of the 1952 movement mass protests by Egyptians erupted against the forced resignation of what became a popular symbol of the new regime.92 Nasser assumed power as president and began a nationalization process that initially had profound effects on the socioeconomic strata of Egyptian society. According to one historian Egypt had for the first time since 343 BC been ruled not by a Macedonian Greek nor a Roman nor an Arab nor a Turk but by an Egyptian.93 Nasser nationalized the Suez Canal leading to the 1956 Suez Crisis. Egypt became increasingly involved in regional affairs until three years after the 1967 SixDay War in which Egypt lost the Sinai to Israel Nasser died and was succeeded by Anwar Sadat. Sadat revived an Egypt Above All orientation switched Egypts Cold War allegiance from the Soviet Union to the United States expelling Soviet advisors in 1972 and launched the Infitah economic reform policy. Like his predecessor he also clamped down on religious and leftist opposition alike. Egyptians fought one last time in the 1973 October War in an attempt to liberate Egyptian territories captured by Israel six years earlier. The October War presented Sadat with a political victory that later allowed him to regain the Sinai. In 1977 Sadat made a historic visit to Israel leading to the signing of the 1978 peace treaty which was supported by the vast majority of Egyptians94 in exchange for the complete Israeli withdrawal from Sinai. Sadat was assassinated in Cairo by members of the Egyptian Islamic Jihad in 1981 and was succeeded by Hosni Mubarak. Hosni Mubarak was the president from 14 October 1981 to 11 February 2011 when he resigned under pressure of popular protest. Although power was ostensibly organized under a multiparty semipresidential system in practice it rested almost solely with the president. In late February 2005 for the first time since the 1952 coup dtat the Egyptian people had an apparent chance to elect a leader from a list of various candidates most prominently Ayman Nour. Most Egyptians were skeptical about the process of democratization and feared that power might ultimately be transferred to the presidents first son Gamal Mubarak.95 After the resignation of Hosni Mubarak presidential powers were transferred to the Supreme Council of the Armed Forces who relinquished power on 30 June 2012 when Islamist candidate Mohamed Morsi became the first democratically elected head of state in Egyptian history. After mass protests he was deposed by a military coup a year after he came to power and subsequently arrested and sentenced to death later overturned and died in prison six years later. The Muslim Brotherhood officially listed as a terrorist group by Egypt after the coup claimed that his death was due to being prevented medicine and poor food.96 Morsi was also charged with leading an outlawed group detention and torture of antigovernment protesters and committing treason by leaking state secrets. In the 2628 May 2014 Egyptian presidential election former General Abdel Fattah elSisi won in a landslide capturing 97 of the vote according to the government. Some regarded the election as undemocratic claiming that several political opponents were being detained or banned from runningaccording to whom but The European Unions Election Observation Mission EOM released a preliminary statement on Thursday after voting commenced stating that the Presidential Elections Commission PEC administered the election professionally and overall in line with the law.97 In 2018 elSisi was reelected with 97 of the vote in an election denounced by human rights groups as unfair and farcical.98 A BBC article mentioned that Three potential candidates dropped out of the race while a fourth  a former military chief  was arrested and accused of running for office without permission.99 Languagesedit Main articles Languages of Egypt Egyptian Arabic and Coptic language Further information Egyptian language A Luxor school teacher lecturing on Eastern Arabic numerals. A 
3 rdcentury Coptic inscription. In the Early Dynastic Period Nile Valley Egyptians spoke the Archaic Egyptian language. In antiquity Egyptians spoke the Egyptian language. It constitutes its own branch of the Afroasiatic family. The Coptic language is the last form of the Egyptian language written in Coptic alphabet which is based on the Greek alphabet and 7 Egyptian Demotic letters. It is worth noting that other languages such as Nubian Arabic and other Libyan languages also existed in Egypt outside of the Nile valley and in the mountains surrounding it since at least the time of Herodotus with Arabic being used mainly in the Eastern Desert and Sinai100 Nubian referred to as Ethiopian By Herodotus South of the first cataract of the Nile101 and other Libyan Languages in the Libyan Desert100 Although Arabic was spoken in parts of Egypt in the preIslamic era such as the Eastern Desert and Sinai100 Coptic was the Language of the majority of Egyptians residing in the Nile Valley. Arabic was adopted by the rulers of Egypt after the Islamic invasion as an official language. Gradually Egyptian Arabic came to replace Coptic as the spoken language.102 Spoken Coptic was mostly extinct by the 
17 th century but may have survived in isolated pockets in Upper Egypt as late as the 
19 th century.103 The official language of Egypt today is Modern Standard Arabic but it is not a spoken language. The spoken vernaculars are Egyptian Arabic Saidi Arabic and their variants and also Bedawi Arabic in the Sinai and Western Egyptian Arabic in the Western desert. The most prestigious and widely spread vernacular is known as Cairene Arabic being spoken by about 50 of the population and the second less prestigious being Saidi Arabic spoken by about 3540 of the population. Modern Standard Arabic is reserved only for official documents written educational material and more formal contexts and is not a naturally spoken language. The recorded history of Egyptian Arabic as a dialect begins in Ottoman Egypt with a document by the 
17 thcentury Moroccan author Yusuf AlMaghribi during after his travels to Egypt writing about the peculiarities of the speech of the Egyptian people       Daf alir an kalm ahl Mir lit. The Removal of the Burden from the Language of the People of Egypt104 This suggests the language that by then was spoken in the majority of Mir EgyptCairo. Its also worth noting that the Egyptians commonly referred to the modern day area of Greater Cairo Cairo Fustat Giza and their surroundings by the name of Mir105106 which was also the name used to refer to the entire land of Egypt. As a consequence and because of the Egyptian habit of identifying people in the capital with the entire countrys name the word Miriyeen Egyptian Arabic Masreyeen which is derived from the Quranic term Mir the Hebrew Bible term Mitzrayim and the Ancient Amarna tablets term Misri lit. Land of Egypt107 and Assyrian records called Egypt Muur.108 commonly referred to the people of Egypts Capital City the greater Cairo area.109 It is represented in a body of vernacular literature comprising novels plays and poetry published over the course of the nineteenth and twentieth centuries. Classical Arabic is also significant in Egyptian literary works as Egyptian novelists and poets were among the first to experiment with modern styles of Arabic literature and the forms they developed have been widely imitated. While Egyptian Arabic is considered derived from the formal Arabic language it has also been influenced by many other languages such as French Turkish and Italian. This is widely thought to be the effects of being the victim of several invasions including that of the Ottoman Empire as well as the French invasion. As each invasion came and went the Egyptians kept the few words and phrases that made the language seem easier. Egyptian Arabic is also influenced by Greek and its grammar structure is influenced by the Coptic stage of the ancient Egyptian language. It is also noteworthy that the Egyptian dialect is the most understood throughout the Arabicspeaking countries. This is because Egyptian movies and Egyptian music have been the most influential in the region and are therefore the most widespread and also because of the political and cultural influence Egypt has on the region. As a result most of the countries in the region have grown up listening to Egyptian Arabic and therefore have no trouble understanding it even though they actually speak their own but they tend to adopt many elements of Egyptian Arabic. This situation is not reciprocal however meaning that the Egyptians do not understand any of the dialects of the region. Originally the Egyptians wrote in hieroglyphics. At first the meaning of the hieroglyphics was unknown until in the year 1799 Napolen Bonapartes soldiers dug up the Rosetta stone. The Rosetta Stone was found broken and incomplete. It features 14 lines in the hieroglyphic script 32 lines in Demotic and 53 lines in Ancient Greek. Its decipherment lead to the understanding of the ancient Egyptian language. Identityedit This article is part of a series on Life in Egypt Culture Architecture Ancient Egyptian art Contemporary Cinema Cuisine Dance Belly dance Raqs sharqi Baladi Tahtib Tanoura Fashion History Holidays Language Literature Music Mythology Radio Sculpture Sport Symbols Flag Anthem Television Society People Identity Education Demographics Health Media Human rights Religion Wildlife World Heritage Sites Politics Presidency Government Parliament Political parties Military Corruption Law enforcement Foreign relations Law Economy Energy Tourism Telecommunications Transportation Egypt portal v t e Further information PanArabism Pharaonism Coptic identity and Islamism Ancient Egyptedit The categorization of people as Egyptians Asiatics Libyans and Nubians occurred in Egyptian documents of state ideology and were contingent on social and cultural factors among the ancient populations themselves. 110 there is a general consensus among Egyptologists that physical differences such as skin color wasnt as important to Ancient Egyptians as it is to modern westerners and that the main criteria in which Ancient Egyptians used to define and distinguish themselves from the others was cultural in nature not racial.111 Anyone who was born in Egypt shared and practiced the Egyptian culture and spoke the Egyptian language was an Egyptian a true person.note 1111 Egypt and Africaedit Even though Egypt is mostly located in North Africa Egypt and the Egyptian people do not generally assert an African identity.112 Egypt and Egyptians often consider themselves to be part of the Arab world rather than the whole African continent.113114115116 Islamic eraedit After a few centuries from the Islamic expansion Egyptian Muslims ceased to be called or identify themselves as Copts and the term became a distinctive name for the Christian minority and members of the Coptic Church who remained identifying themselves as Copts while the Muslim majority were defined and identified themselves as Arabs. 117118119120121122123 During her stay in Upper Egypt Lady Duff Gordon mentions the opinion of an Upper Egyptian man on the Ahmad Al Tayeb Uprising124 that happened during her stay. She puts what he said thus Truly in all the world none are miserable like us Arabs. The Turks beat us and the Europeans hate us and say quite right. By God we had better lay down our heads in the dust die and let the strangers take our land and grow cotton for themselves.125 Ibrahim Pasha the son of Mohammed Ali Pasha who was an Albanian told one of his soldiers after criticizing Turks I am not a Turk I came to Egypt when I was a child and since that time its sun has changed my blood and I became fully Arab.126 Modern periodedit This section may be unbalanced towards certain viewpoints. Please improve the article or discuss the issue on the talk page. August 2023 Around the end of the 
19 th and early 
20 th century the state started making efforts to shape a collective Egyptian Identity and Egyptian nationalism in face of the British rule. However the revolution of Ahmed Orabi is considered to be a turning point in Egyptian History citation needed as it fought for the Egyptian identity where Egyptians rejected any other identity and identified only as Egyptians Masreyeen.citation needed It is worth noting that in the past Egyptians sometimes also used to refer to the area of Greater Cairo by the name of Masr105127 which was also the name used to refer to the entire land of Egypt. As a consequence and because of the Egyptian habit of identifying people with their city names the word MisreyeenMasreyeen sometimes referred to the people of the greater Cairo area.109 The Orabi movement in the 18
70 s and 18
80 s was the first major Egyptian nationalist movement that demanded an end to the alleged despotism of the Muhammad Ali family and demanded curbing the growth of European influence in Egypt it campaigned under the nationalist slogan of Egypt for Egyptians.128 The Orabi revolt is referred to in Egypt as the revolt of the fellahin rural Egyptians Ahmed Orabi himself was a rural Egyptian from a village in Zagazig. Following the French campaign in Egypt western ideas started becoming prevalent among Egyptian intellectuals citation needed which continued after the British occupation of Egypt. Among the western ideas the French Enlightenment notion of reviving PreChristian civilizations and cultures found a special place among Egyptian Nationalists citation needed who sought to revive the Pharaonic culture as the main preIslamicpreChristian civilization of Egypt. Questions of identity came to fore in the late 
19 th century and in the 
20 th century as Egyptians sought to free themselves from British occupation leading to the rise of ethnoterritorial secular Egyptian nationalism also known as Pharaonism. After Egyptians gained their independence from Great Britain other political ideologies that were rejected earlier by the Egyptians such as panArabism were adopted by the political leadership there was also a rise of Islamism. Pharaonism rose to political prominence in the 19
20 s and 19
30 s as an Egyptian movement resisting the British occupation as Egypt developed separately from the Arab world. A segment of Egyptian intellectuals argued that Egypt was part of a Mediterranean civilization. This ideology largely developed out of the countrys lengthy preIslamic preArabism history the relative isolation of the Nile Valley and the mostly homogeneous indigenous nonArab genetic ancestryethnicity of the inhabitants129 regardless of current religious identity. One of Pharaonisms most notable advocates was Taha Hussein who remarked Pharaonism is deeply rooted in the spirits of the Egyptians. It will remain so and it must continue and become stronger. The Egyptian is Pharaonic before being Arab. Egypt must not be asked to deny its Pharaonism because that would mean Egypt destroy your Sphinx and your pyramids forget who you are and follow us Do not ask of Egypt more than it can offer. Egypt will never become part of some Arab unity whether the capital of this unity were to be Cairo Damascus or Baghdad.130 Pharaonism became the dominant mode of expression of Egyptian anticolonial activists of the prewar and interwar periods. In 1931 following a visit to Egypt Syrian Arab nationalist Sati alHusri remarked that Egyptians did not possess an Arab nationalist sentiment did not accept that Egypt was a part of the Arab lands and would not acknowledge that the Egyptian people were part of the Arab nation.131 The later 19
30 s would become a formative period for Arab nationalism without the involvement of Egypt. Arab nationalism developed as a regional nationalism initially based on the efforts of Syrian Palestinian and Lebanese political intellectuals.132 ArabIslamic political sentiment was fueled by the solidarity felt between on the one hand Egyptians struggling for independence from Britain and on the other hand those across the Arab world engaged in similar antiimperialist struggles. In particular the growth of Zionism in neighboring Palestine was seen as a threat by many Egyptians and the cause of resistance there was adopted by rising Islamic movements such as the Muslim Brotherhood as well as the political leadership including King Faruq I and the Egyptian Prime Minister Mustafa elNahhas.129 Historian H. S. Deighton wrote The Egyptians are not Arabs and both they and the Arabs are aware of this fact. They are Arabicspeaking and they are Muslim... But the Egyptian during the first thirty years of the twentieth century was not aware of any particular bond with the Arab East... Egypt sees in the Arab cause a worthy object of real and active sympathy and at the same time a great and proper opportunity for the exercise of leadership as well as for the enjoyment of its fruits. But she is still Egyptian first and Arab only in consequence and her main interests are still domestic.133 Until the 19
40 s Egypt was more in favour of territorial Egyptian nationalism and distant from the panArabism ideology. Egyptians generally did not identify themselves as Arabs and it is revealing that when the Egyptian nationalist leader Saad Zaghloul met the Arab delegates at Versailles in 1918 he insisted that their struggles for statehood were not connected maintaining that the problem of Egypt was an Egyptian problem and not an Arab one.134 Nasserismedit It was not until the Nasser era more than a decade later that Arab nationalism and by extension Arab socialism became a state policy and a means with which to define Egypts position in the Middle East and the world135 usually articulated visvis Zionism in the neighboring new state of Israel. Nassers politics was shaped by his conviction that all the Arab states were contending with antiimperialist struggles and thus solidarity between them was imperative for independence. He viewed the earlier Egyptian nationalism of Saad Zaghloul as too inwardlooking and saw no conflict between Egyptian patriotism wataniyya and Arab nationalism qawmiyya.136 For a while Egypt and Syria formed the United Arab Republic UAR which lasted for about 3 years. When the union was dissolved Egypt continued to be known as the UAR until 1971 when Egypt adopted the current official name the Arab Republic of Egypt.137 The Egyptians attachment to Arabism was particularly questioned after the 1967 SixDay War. Thousands of Egyptians had lost their lives and the country became disillusioned with Arab politics.138 Although the Arabism instilled in the country by Nasser was not deeply embedded in society a certain kinship with the rest of the Arab world was firmly established and Egypt saw itself as the leader of this larger cultural entity. Nassers version of panArabism stressed Egyptian sovereignty and leadership of Arab unity instead of the eastern Arab states.136 Nassers successor Anwar elSadat both through public policy and his peace initiative with Israel revived an uncontested Egyptian orientation unequivocally asserting that only Egypt and Egyptians were his responsibility. According to Dawisha the terms Arab Arabism and Arab unity save for the new official name became conspicuously absent.139 See also Liberal age and Republic sections. However despite Sadats systematic attempts to root out Arab sentiment Arab nationalism in Egypt remained a potent force.140 During this era in 1978 EgyptianAmerican sociologist Saad Eddin Ibrahim studied the national discourse between 17 Egyptian intellectuals relating to Egypts identity and peace with Israel. He noted that in 18 articles Arab identity was acknowledged and neutrality in the conflict opposed while in eight articles Arab identity was acknowledged and neutrality supported and only in three articles written by author Louis Awad was Arab identity rejected and neutrality supported.141 Egyptian scholar Gamal Hamdan stressed that Egyptian identity was unique but that Egypt was the center and cultural hub of the Arab world arguing that Egypt in the Arab world is like Cairo in Egypt. Hamdan further contended We do not see the Egyptian personality no matter how distinct it may be as anything other than a part of the personality of the greater Arab homeland.140 Many Egyptians today feel that Egyptian and Arab identities are inextricably linked and emphasize the central role that Egypt plays in the Arab world. Others continue to believe that Egypt and Egyptians are simply not Arab emphasizing indigenous Egyptian heritage culture and independent polity pointing to the perceived failures of Arab and panArab nationalist policies. Egyptian anthropologist Laila elHamamsy illustrates the modernday relationship between the two trends stating in light of their history Egyptians ... should be conscious of their national identity and consider themselves above all Egyptians. How is the Egyptian with this strong sense of Egyptian identity able to look himself as an Arab too142 Her explanation is that Egyptianization translated as Arabization with the result being an increased tempo of Arabization for facility in the Arabic language opened the windows into the rich legacy of Arabic culture. ... Thus in seeking a cultural identity Egypt has revived its Arab cultural heritage.141 Cultureedit Main article Culture of Egypt See also Ancient Egypt Egyptian culture boasts five millennia of recorded history. Ancient Egypt was among the earliest and greatest civilizations during which the Egyptians maintained a strikingly complex and stable culture that influenced later cultures of Europe the Near East and Africa. After the Pharaonic era the Egyptians themselves came under the influence of Hellenism Christianity and Islamic culture. Today many aspects of ancient Egyptian culture exist in interaction with newer elements including the influence of modern Western culture itself influenced by Ancient Egypt. Surnamesedit An Egyptian elder 18
60 s Today Egyptians carry names that have Ancient Egyptian Arabic Turkish Greek and Western meanings especially Coptic ones among others. The concept of a surname is lacking in Egypt. Rather Egyptians tend to carry their fathers name as their first middle name and stop at the 
2 nd or 
3 rd first name which thus becomes ones surname. In this manner surnames continuously change with generations as first names of 
4 th or 
5 th generations get dropped. A serpent charmer in Egypt 18
60 s Some Egyptians tend to have Surnames based on their cities like Monoufi from Monufia Banhawy from Benha Aswany from Aswan Tahtawy from Tahta Fayoumi from Fayoum Eskandarani  Eskandar from Alexandria Sohagi from Sohag and so on. As a result of the Islamic history of Egypt and as a result of the subsequent Arabization some Egyptians adopted historical Berber Arabic and Iranian names. For example the surname Al Juhaini is from the Arabic Juhainah which is very rare except in a few instances in North Egypt and the surname Al Hawary is from the Berber Hawara. The concept of surname however is extremely rare in Egypt and the mentioned surnames are extremely rare. Historical Arabic names in general are most likely just historically adopted as status names which is something that happened with Greek names as well in GreekRoman times where Egyptians would adopt Greek names as status names. Some Egyptians have their family names based on their traditional crafts like El Nagar Carpenter El Fawal the one who sells Foul El Hadad Blacksmith El Khayat Tailor and so on. The majority of Egyptians however have last names that are their greatgrandparents first names this habit is especially dominant among the fellahin rural Egyptians where the concept of surnames is not really a strong tradition. For example if a person named Khaled Emad Salama Ali has a son named Ashraf his sons full name may become Ashraf Khaled Emad Salama. Thus a son may have a last name that is different from his fathers last name. However it is not unusual for many Egyptian families to adopt Ancient Egyptianbased names especially Coptic ones and have their first names or surnames beginning with the Ancient Egyptian masculine possessive pronoun pa generally ba in Arabic which lost the phoneme p in the course of developing from ProtoSemitic but the Egyptians still have the phoneme p in their spoken language. For example Bashandy Coptic  the one of acacia Bakhoum Coptic  the one of an eagle Bekhit Coptic  the one of the north Bahur Coptic  the one of Horus and Banoub Coptic   the one of Anubis.143 The name Shenouda Coptic  which is very common among Copts means child of God. Hence names and many toponyms may end with nouda noudi or nuti which means Of God in Egyptian and Coptic. In addition Egyptian families often derive their name from places in Egypt such as Minyawi from Minya and Suyuti from Asyut or from one of the local Sufi orders such as elShazli and elSawy. More examples of prominent surnames are Qozman and Habib. With the adoption of Christianity and eventually Islam Egyptians began to take on names associated with these religions. Many Egyptian surnames also became Hellenized and Arabized meaning they were altered to sound Greek or Arabic. This was done by the addition of the Greek suffix ios to Egyptian names such as for example Pakhom to Pakhomios or by adding the Egyptian Arabic definite article el to Egyptian names such as for example Bayoumi to elBayoumi Bayoumi without the article is even more common. Names starting with the Ancient Egyptian affix pu of the place of were sometimes Arabized to abu father of for example Busiri of the place of Osiris occasionally became Abusir and elBusiri. Few people might also have surnames like elShamy the Levantine suggesting a possible Levantine origin or in the upper classes Dewidar suggesting a possible OttomanMamluk remnant but these names are very rare and could also be just historically adopted as status names. Conversely some Levantines might carry the surname elMasri the Egyptian suggesting a possible Egyptian extraction. The Egyptian peasantry the fellahin rural Egyptians are more likely to retain indigenous names given their relative isolation throughout the Egyptian peoples history. With French influence names like Mounier Pierre and many others became common more so in the Christian community. Genetic and biological historyedit Main article DNA history of Egypt See also Population history of Egypt According to historian Donald Redford the earliest Paleolithic and Neolithic periods of prehistoric Egypt have left very little in the way of archaeological evidence but by around 9000 to 6000 BC Neolithic farming settlements had appeared all over Egypt.144 Some studies based on morphological145 genetic146147148149150 and archaeological data151152153154 have attributed these settlements to migrants from the Fertile Crescent in the Near East returning during the Egyptian and North African Neolithic bringing agriculture to the region. However other scholars have disputed this view and cited linguistic155 biological anthropological156 archaeological157158159 and genetic data160161162 which does not support the hypothesis of a mass migration from the Levantine during the prehistoric period. According to historian William Stiebling and archaeologist Susan N. Helft this view posits that the ancient Egyptians are the same original population group as Nubians and other Saharan populations with some genetic input from Arabian Levantine North African and IndoEuropean groups who have known to have settled in Egypt during its long history.163 Keita stated that genetic data indicates that the P2 PN2 marker within the E haplogroup connects the predominant Y chromosome lineage found in Africa overall after the modern human left Africa. P
2 M21555 is found from the Horn of Africa up through the Nile Valley and west to the Maghreb and P
2 V
38 M2 is predominant in most of infraSaharan tropical Africa.164 Similarly Ehret cited genetic evidence which had identified the Horn of Africa as a source of a genetic marker M35215 Ychromosome lineage for a significant population component which moved north from that region into Egypt and the Levant. Ehret argued that this genetic distribution paralleled the spread of the Afrasian language family with the movement of people from the Horn of Africa into Egypt and added a new demic component to the existing population of Egypt 17000 years ago.165 Beginning in the predynastic period some differences between the populations of Upper and Lower Egypt were ascertained through their skeletal remains suggesting a gradual clinal pattern north to south.166167168169 The mummy of 
19 th Dynasty King Ramesses II. When Lower and Upper Egypt were unified c. 3200 BC the distinction began to blur resulting in a more homogeneous population in Egypt though the distinction remains true to some degree to this day.170171172 Some biological anthropologists such as Shomarka Keita believe the range of variability to be primarily indigenous and not necessarily the result of significant intermingling of widely divergent peoples.173 In 2005 Keita examined Badarian crania from predynastic upper Egypt in comparison to various European and tropical African crania. He found that the predynastic Badarian series clustered closer with the tropical African series. The comparative samples were selected based on Brace et al.s 1993 comments on the affinities of an upper EgyptianNubian epipalaeolithic series.174 Keita describes the northern and southern patterns of the early predynastic period as northernEgyptianMaghreb and tropical African variant overlapping with NubiaKush respectively. He shows that a progressive change in Upper Egypt toward the northern Egyptian pattern of Lower Egypt takes place through the predynastic period. The southern pattern continues to predominate in Abydos Upper Egypt by the First Dynasty but lower Egyptian North African and European patterns are observed also thus making for great diversity.175 A group of noted physical anthropologists conducted craniofacial studies of Egyptian skeletal remains and concluded similarly that the Egyptians have been in place since back in the Pleistocene and have been largely unaffected by either invasions or migrations. As others have noted Egyptians are Egyptians and they were so in the past as well.176 Genetic analysis of modern Egyptians reveals that they have paternal lineages common to indigenous NorthEast African populations primarily and to Near Eastern peoples to a lesser extentthese lineages would have spread during the Neolithic and were maintained by the predynastic period.177178 University of Chicago Egyptologist Frank Yurco suggested a historical regional and ethnolinguistic continuity asserting that the mummies and skeletons of ancient Egyptians indicate they were similar to the modern Egyptians and other people of the AfroAsiatic ethnic grouping.179 Another study found that the average Egyptian male has 85 Native North African ancestry Both Egyptian Christians and Muslim were found to be closely related and stem from the same grandparents according to a 2020 study by Forensic science international 313180 adding a quote Therefore from these results we conclude that Egyptian Muslims and Egyptian Christians genetically originate from the same ancestors A 2006 bioarchaeological study on the dental morphology of ancient Egyptians by Prof. Joel Irish shows dental traits characteristic of indigenous North Africans and to a lesser extent Southwest Asian and European populations. Among the samples included in the study is skeletal material from the Hawara tombs of Fayum which clustered very closely with the Badarian series of the predynastic period. All the samples particularly those of the Dynastic period were significantly divergent from a neolithic West Saharan sample from Lower Nubia. Biological continuity was also found intact from the dynastic to the postpharaonic periods. According to Irish The Egyptian samples 996 mummies exhibit morphologically simple massreduced dentitions that are similar to those in populations from greater North Africa Irish 1993 19
98 ac 2000 and to a lesser extent western Asia and Europe Turner 19
85 a Turner and Markowitz 1990 Roler 1992 Lipschultz 1996 Irish 19
98 a. Similar craniofacial measurements among samples from these regions were reported as well Brace et al. 1993... an inspection of MMD values reveals no evidence of increasing phenetic distance between samples from the first and second halves of this almost 30
00 yearlong period. For example phenetic distances between FirstSecond Dynasty Abydos and samples from Fourth Dynasty Saqqara MMD  
0.0 50 11
12 th Dynasty Thebes 
0.0 00 
12 th Dynasty Lisht 
0.0 72 
19 th Dynasty Qurneh 
0.0 53 and 
26 th
30 th Dynasty Giza 
0.0 27 do not exhibit a directional increase through time... Thus despite increasing foreign influence after the Second Intermediate Period not only did Egyptian culture remain intact Lloyd 20
00 a but the people themselves as represented by the dental samples appear biologically constant as well... Gebel Ramlah Neolithic NubianWestern Desert sample is in fact significantly different from Badari based on the 
22 trait MMD Table 4. For that matter the Neolithic Western Desert sample is significantly different from all others but is closest to predynastic and early dynastic samples.181 A study by Schuenemann et al. 2017 described the extraction and analysis of DNA from 151 mummified ancient Egyptian individuals whose remains were recovered from Abusir elMeleq in Middle Egypt. The specimens were living in a period stretching from the late New Kingdom to the Roman era 1388 BCE426 CE. Complete mitochondrial DNA mtDNA sequences were obtained for 90 of the mummies and were compared with each other and with several other ancient and modern datasets. The scientists found that the ancient Egyptian individuals in their own dataset possessed highly similar mitochondrial profiles throughout the examined period. Modern Egyptians generally shared this maternal haplogroup pattern. The study was able to measure the mitochondrial DNA of 90 individuals and it showed that the mitochondrial DNA composition of Egyptian mummies has shown a high level of affinity with the DNA of the populations of the Near East and North African populations and had significantly more affinity with southeastern Europeans than with subSaharan Africans. Genomewide data could only be successfully extracted from three of these individuals. Of these three the Ychromosome haplogroups of two individuals could be assigned to the MiddleEastern haplogroup J and one to haplogroup E
1 b
1 b1 common in North Africa. The absolute estimates of subSaharan African ancestry in these three individuals ranged from 6 to 15 which is slightly less than the level of subSaharan African ancestry in modern Egyptians the modern Egyptian samples were taken from Cairo and the Bahariya Oasis which ranged from 14 to 21. The ranges depend on the method and choice of reference populations. The studys authors cautioned that the mummies may not be representative of the ancient Egyptian population as a whole since they were recovered from the northern part of middle Egypt.182 Professor Stephen Quirke an Egyptologist at University College London expressed caution about the paper by Schuenemann et al. 2017 saying that There has been this very strong attempt throughout the history of Egyptology to disassociate ancient Egyptians from the modern Egyptian population. He added that he was particularly suspicious of any statement that may have the unintended consequences of assertingyet again from a Northern European or North American perspectivethat theres a discontinuity there between ancient and modern Egyptians. Gourdine et al. criticised the methodology of the Scheunemann et al. study and argued that the SubSaharan genetic affinities may be attributed to early settlers and the relevant SubSaharan genetic markers do not correspond with the geography of known trade routes.183 A 2020 study by Gad Hawass et al. analysed mitochondrial and Ychromosomal haplogroups from Tutankhamuns family members of the 
18 th Dynasty using comprehensive control procedures to ensure quality results. The study found that the Ychromosome haplogroup of the family was R
1 b which is believed to have originated in the Western AsiaNear Eastern region and dispersed from there to Europe and parts of Africa during the Neolithic.184185 Haplogroup R
1 b is carried by modern Egyptians.184 Modern Egypt is also the only African country that is known to harbor all three R1 subtypes including R
1 bM2
69.1 86 The Ychromosome profiles for Tutankhamun and Amenhotep III were incomplete and the analysis produced differing probability figures despite having concordant allele results. Because the relationships of these two mummies with the KV55 mummy identified as Akhenaten had previously been confirmed in an earlier study the haplogroup prediction of both mummies could be derived from the full profile of the KV55 data.184 A followup study by Scheunemann  Urban et al. 2021 was carried out collecting samples from six excavation sites along the entire length of the Nile valley spanning 4000 years of Egyptian history. Samples from 17 mummies and 14 skeletal remains were collected and high quality mitochondrial genomes were reconstructed from 10 individuals. According to the authors the analyzed mitochondrial genomes matched the results from the 2017 study at Abusir elMeleq.187 In 2022 archaeologist Danielle Candelora stated that there were several limitations with the 2017 Scheunemann et al. study such as new untested sampling methods small sample size and problematic comparative data.188 In 2022 S.O.Y. Keita analysed 8 Short Tandem loci STR published data from studies by Hawass et al. 20102012189190 which sought to determine familial relations and research pathological features such as potential infectious diseases among the New Kingdom royal mummies which included Tutankhamun and Rameses III. Keita using an algorithm that only has three choices Eurasians SubSaharan Africans and East Asians concluded that the majority of the samples which included the genetic remains of Tutankhamun and Rameses III had a population affinity with SubSaharan Africans in one affinity analysis. However Keita cautioned that this does not mean that the royal mummies lacked other affiliations which he argued had been obscured in typological thinking. Keita further added that different data and algorithms might give different results which reflected the complexity of biological heritage and the associated interpretation.191 In 2023 Christopher Ehret reported that biological anthropological findings had determined major burial sites of those founding locales of ancient Egypt in the fourth millennium BCE notably ElBadari as well as Naqada show no demographic indebtedness to the Levant. Ehret specified that these studies revealed cranial and dental affinities with closest parallels to other longtime populations in the surrounding areas of Northeastern Africa such as Nubia and the northern Horn of Africa. He further commented that the Naqada and Badarian populations did not migrate from somewhere else but were descendants of the longterm inhabitants of these portions of Africa going back many millennia.192 Ehret also criticised the study for asserting that there was no subSaharan component in the Egyptian population. A study by Hammarn et al. 2023 isolated the NonAfrican components of the genomes of modern day Northeast Africans and found that Sudanese Copts and Egyptian Muslims from Cairo bore most similarities to Levantines unlike the other populations in the region which had predominant genetic contributions from the Arabian peninsula rather than Levant for their NonAfrican genetic component. The study also found that Egyptian Muslims and Sudanese Copts are genetically most similar to Middle Eastern groups rather than the other African populations and they estimated the Admixture date for Egyptians with Eurasians to have occurred around the 
14 th century however the authors noted that most if not all of the populations in this study have or have had admixture with populations from the Middle East during the Arab expansion and this newer admixture is obscuring older admixture patterns. The study overall points that the distribution of eurasian ancestry in modern eastern and northeast Africa is the result of more recent migrations that many of which is recorded in historical texts rather than ancient ones.193 See alsoedit Egypt portal Saidi people Nubian people Beja people Siwi people Religion in Egypt List of Egyptians Egyptian Americans Egyptians in the United Kingdom Egyptian diaspora Egyptian nationalism Referencesedit  a b    13    . BBC News Arabic. 20170930. Retrieved 20180901.      .     . msrintranet.capmas.gov.eg. Archived from the original on 20191231. Retrieved 20160720.  a b c d e 
9.5  million Egyptians live abroad mostly in Saudi Arabia and Jordan. egyptindependent.com. Egypt Independent. 1 October 2017. Archived from the original on 3 January 2018. Retrieved 3 January 2018.   Talani Leila S. Out of Egypt. University of California Los Angeles. 2005. httpsescholarship.orgucitem
84 t
8 q
4 p1 Archived 20200328 at the Wayback Machine  2015 American Community Survey 
1 Year Estimates archived from the original on 20200214 retrieved 20181013  Wahba Jackline. A Study of Egyptian Return Migrants Archived 20110629 at the Wayback Machine. February 2011.  Zohry Ayman 9 January 2014. Egypts International Migration after the Revolution Is There Any Change. Cairn.info.  Egyptian Arabic. Ethnologue. Retrieved 22 November 2023.  a b c d CAPMAS.    471       2016 PDF in Arabic. Archived PDF from the original on 19 May 2020. Retrieved 4 January 2018.  Egiziani in Italia  statistiche e distribuzione per regione. Tuttitalia.it in Italian. Archived from the original on 20210624. Retrieved 20210621.  Statistics Canada 8 May 2013. 2011 National Household Survey Data tables. Archived from the original on 24 December 2018. Retrieved 11 February 2014.  Jews by Country of Origin and Age. Statistical Abstract of Israel in English and Hebrew. Israel Central Bureau of Statistics. 26 September 2011. Archived from the original on 27 December 2018. Retrieved 31 July 2016.  Table 
1.3  Overseasborn population in the United Kingdom excluding some residents in communal establishments by sex by country of birth January 2019 to December 2019. Office for National Statistics. 21 May 2020. Retrieved 28 June 2020. Figure given is the central estimate. See the source for 95 confidence intervals.  2011 QuickStats Country of Birth Egypt. Censusdata.abs.gov.au. Archived from the original on 20170829. Retrieved 20130522.  Auslnder in Deutschland bis 2019 Herkunftsland. de.statista.com. Archived from the original on 20170130. Retrieved 20210714.  a b c d e f Immigrant and Emigrant Populations by Country of Origin and Destination. migrationpolicy.org. February 10 2014. Archived from the original on April 14 2021. Retrieved August 8 2020.  CBS Statline. Archived from the original on 20180117. Retrieved 20201004.  Bevlkerung nach StaatsangehrigkeitGeburtsland.  Prsentation de lgypte  Ministre de lEurope et des Affaires trangres Archived 20200621 at the Wayback Machine. Diplomatie.gouv.fr. Retrieved on 20200602.  a b c Egypt  International emigrant stock. Archived from the original on 20221107. Retrieved 20221107.  Goldschmidt Arthur 2008. A Brief History of Egypt. Facts on File Inc. p. 241. ISBN 9780816066728. People Ethnic groups Egyptians 98 Bedouins Berbers Nubians Greeks.  Hoffman Valerie J. Sufism Mystics and Saints in Modern Egypt. University of South Carolina Press 1995. 1 Archived August 29 2005 at the Wayback Machine  Chariot to Heaven Kemet.  Coptic Language Spoken  Claremont Coptic Encyclopedia Archived 20130922 at the Wayback Machine. Cdm15831.contentdm.oclc.org. Retrieved on 20200602.  Akram A. I. 1977 The Muslim Conquest of Egypt and North Africa Ferozsons ISBN 9789690002242  National Geographic Geno 
2.0  Project  Egypt archived from the original on 20170207 retrieved 20181022 Egypt 71 North and East African. As ancient populations first migrated from Africa they passed first through northeast Africa to southwest Asia. The Northern Africa and Arabian components in Egypt are representative of that ancient migratory route as well as later migrations from the Fertile Crescent back into Africa with the spread of agriculture over the past 10000 years and migrations in the seventh century with the spread of Islam from the Arabian Peninsula. The East African component likely reflects localized movement up the navigable Nile River while the Southern Europe and Asia Minor components reflect the geographic and historical role of Egypt as a historical player in the economic and cultural growth across the Mediterranean region.  a b C. Petry. Copts in Late Medieval Egypt. Coptic Encyclopaedia. 2618 1991.  Goldschmidt Arthur 1988 Modern Egypt The formation of a nation state Avalon ISBN 9780865311824 Among the peoples of the ancient Near East only the Egyptians have stayed where they were and remained what they were although they have changed their language once and their religion twice. In a sense they constitute the worlds oldest nation.  Arthur Goldschmidt  Dallmayr Fred Akif Kayapnar M. Yaylac smail 24 September 2014 Civilizations and World Order Lexington Books ISBN 9780739186077  An Account of the Manners and Customs of the Modern EgyptiansLONDON  TORONTO PUBLISHED BY JMDENT SONS IN NEW YORK BY EP DUTTON  CO. P4 quoteThe modem Egyptian metropolis to the inhabitants of which most of the contents of the following pages relate is now called  Masr more properly Misr but was formerly named  ElKahireh whence Europeans have formed the name of Cairo  An Account of the Manners and Customs of the Modern Egyptians P 27.LONDON  TORONTO PUBLISHED BY JMDENT SONS IN NEW YORK BY EP DUTTON  CO. quoteThe native Muslim inhabitants of Cairo commonly call themselves  ElMasreeyeen OwladMaasr  or  Ahl Masr  and OwladelBeled which signify People of Masr Children of. Masr and Children of the Town  the singular forms of these appellations are Maasree IbnMasr and IbnelBeled. Of these three terms the last is most common in the town itself. The country people are called ElFellaheen or the agriculturists in the singular Fellah. P4 quoteThe modern Egyptian metropolis to the inhabitants of which most of the contents of the following pages relate is now called  Masr more properly Misr but was formerly named  ElKahireh whence Europeans have formed the name of Cairo  Lane Edward William. An Account of the Manners and Customs of the Modern Egyptians. Cairo American University in Cairo 2003. Rep. of 
5 th ed 1860. pp. 2627.     . CAPMAS      .  Martino John ed. 2013. Worldwide Government Directory with Intergovernmental Organizations 2013. CQ Press. p. 508. ISBN 9781452299372. Archived from the original on 5 August 2020. Retrieved 19 July 2016.  Egypts Sisi meets world Evangelical churches delegation in Cairo. AlAhram Weekly. Archived from the original on 20180504. Retrieved 20180426.  Egypt. The CIA World Factbook Archived 20211009 at the Wayback Machine. 2006.  EgyptDemographic trends. britannica.com. Archived from the original on 20210911. Retrieved 20190928.  Migration And Development In Egypt PDF. Archived from the original PDF on 20160501. Retrieved 20171028.  Wakin Edward. A Lonely Minority. The Modern Story of Egypts Copts. New York William Morrow  Company 1963. pp. 3031 37.  of which c. 4 million in the Egyptian diaspora. Newsreel. Egyptians count Archived 20071011 at the Wayback Machine. 2007 Ahram Weekly. 511 April  a b Talani Leila S. Out of Egypt. Archived 20081210 at the Wayback Machine University of California Los Angeles. 2005.  Mitchell Josh. Egyptians came for jobs then built lives. Archived from the original on August 19 2006. Retrieved 20080413.. Baltimore Sun. August 13 2006.  EHRO. Migrant workers in SAUDI ARABIA. March 2003. Archived June 16 2006 at the Wayback Machine  IRIN. EGYPT Migrant workers face abuse. March 7 2006. Archived September 7 2006 at the Wayback Machine  Evans Brian. Plight of Foreign Workers in Saudi Arabia.  Kapiszewski Andrzej. United Nations Report on International Migration and Development. May 22 2006. Archived July 31 2006 at the Wayback Machine  Rod Nordland 2008. The Last Egyptian Belly Dancer. Newsweek. Archived from the original on 20100328. Retrieved 20080602.  AfricaNet. Libya. Archived May 3 2006 at the Wayback Machine  Vatikiotis P.J. The History of Modern Egypt. 
4 th edition. Baltimore Johns Hopkins University 1992 p. 432  Grimal p. 93  Watterson p. 15  Watterson p. 192  Kamil Jill. Coptic Egypt History and Guide. Cairo American University in Cairo 1997. p. 11  Watterson p. 215  Jankowski p. 28  Kamil p. 12  Watterson p. 214  Watterson p. 237  qtd. in Alan K. Bowman Egypt after the Pharaohs 332 BC  AD 642. Berkeley University of California Press 1996. p. 126.  Jankowski p. 29  Kamil p. 16  Kamil p. 21  a b Jankowski p. 32  Kamil p. 35  Kamil p. 39  Watterson p. 232  Kamil p. 40  a b Watterson p. 268  ElDaly Okasha. Egyptology The Missing Millennium. London UCL Press 2005. p. 165  ElDaly p. 140  Vatikiotis P.J. The History of Modern Egypt. 
4 th ed. Baltimore Johns Hopkins University Press 1991. p. 26  ElDaly p. 164  ElDaly p. 112  Opet Festival. Archived from the original on May 3 2006.  A Short History of Egypt  to about 1970 from University of Standford PDF. Archived PDF from the original on 20201202. Retrieved 20170815.  Dobon Begoa Hassan Hisham Y. Laayouni Hafid Luisi Pierre RicaoPonce Isis Zhernakova Alexandra Wijmenga Cisca Tahir Hanan Comas David Netea Mihai G. Bertranpetit Jaume 28 May 2015. The genetics of East African populations a NiloSaharan component in the African genetic landscape. Scientific Reports. 5 1 9996. Bibcode20
15 NatSR...
5 E99
96 D. doi
10.1 0
38 srep09996. PMC 4446898. PMID 26017457.  Jankowski p. 35  A Short History of Egypt p. 47  Vatikiotis p. 31  Jankowski p. 60  a b Jankowskil p. 74  a b Vatikiotis p. 11516  ElDaly p. 29  Jankowski p. 83  Vatikiotis p. 135  Vatikiotis p. 189  qtd. in Vatikiotis p. 227  Jankowski p. 112  qtd. in Jankowski p. 123  Jankowski p. 130  Salmawy Mohamed. Dialogues of Naguib Mahfouz Mon Egypte Archived 20061002 at the Wayback Machine. AlAhram Weekly. 1016 August 2006.  Jankowski p. 137  Watterson Barbara 19981204. Watterson p. 294. Wiley. ISBN 9780631211952. Retrieved 20120906.  Vatikiotis p. 443  Egyptians stage protest over call for Mubaraks son to be president 22 September 2010 archived from the original on 22 October 2018 retrieved 22 October 2018  Egypts ousted president Mohammed Morsi dies in court. BBC News. 17 June 2019. Archived from the original on 17 June 2019. Retrieved 17 June 2019.  ElSisi wins Egypts presidential race with 
96.9 1. English.Ahram.org. Ahram Online. Archived from the original on 31 July 2014. Retrieved 3 June 2014.  Human Rights Watch 13 February 2018. Egypt Planned Presidential Vote Neither Free Nor Fair. Human Rights Watch. Archived from the original on 14 July 2019. Retrieved 8 January 2018.  Egypt election Sisi set to win second term as president. BBC. 29 March 2018. Archived from the original on 8 March 2021. Retrieved 30 March 2018.  a b c The History of Herodotus By GEORGE RAWLINSON Page 9  The History of Herodotus By GEORGE RAWLINSON Page 33  Arab Invasions The First Islamic Empire  History Today. www.historytoday.com. Archived from the original on 20181204. Retrieved 20180317.  The language may have survived in isolated pockets in Upper Egypt as late as the 
19 th century according to James Edward Quibell When did Coptic become extinct in Zeitschrift fr gyptische Sprache und Altertumskunde 39 1901 p. 87.  Elisabeth Zack. Yusuf alMaghribis EgyptianArabic Word List. A Unique Manuscript in the St. Petersburg State University Library Manuscripta orientalia  ISSN 12385018  2001 vol. 7 no3 pp. 4649. literally The lifting of the burden from the speech of the population of Egypt by Ysuf alMaribi  a b Al Khutat Al Maqrizia An Account of The City of Fustat Misr           Al Khutat Al Maqrizia An Account of the City of Fustat Misr Today and its Description        . quote              . TranslationAccording to Ibn Radwan The greatest city in Fustat Misr now is of 4 parts Fustat Cairo. Giza and Al Jazira.  Daniel I. Block 19 June 1998. The Book of Ezekiel Chapters 25 48. Wm. B. Eerdmans Publishing. p. 166. ISBN 9780802825360.  George Evans 1883. An Essay on Assyriology. Williams and Norgate  pub. by the Hibbert trustees. p. 49.  a b An Account of the Manners and Customs of the Modern Egyptians P 2.LONDON  TORONTO PUBLISHED BY JMDENT SONS IN NEWYORK BY EP DUTTON  CO.  Thomas Schneider 2018. Ethnic Identities in Ancient Egypt and the Identity of Egyptology Towards a TransEgyptology. Journal of Egyptian History. 11 12 243246. doi
10.1 1631874166512340049. S
2 CID 211669759. Archived from the original on 20190403. Retrieved 20191009.  a b Jr William H. Stiebing Helft Susan N. 20230703. Ancient Near Eastern History and Culture. Taylor  Francis. ISBN 9781000880663.  Khalid Sunni M. 7 February 2011. The Root Race And Racism Divide Egypt. NPR. Archived from the original on 20180629. Retrieved 20191008. Many Egyptians do not consider themselves Africans. Some take offense even to being identified with Africa at all. When speaking to Egyptians who have traveled to countries below the Sahara nearly all of them speak of going to Africa or going down to Africa as if Egypt were separate from the rest of the continent.  Middle EastNorth Africa MENA. MENA countries consist of Algeria Bahrain Egypt Iran Iraq Israel Jordan Kuwait Lebanon Libya Morocco Oman Qatar Saudi Arabia Syria Tunisia United Arab Emirates and Yemen.  Siegelbaum Max July 19 2013. Black Egyptians decry daily racism. Al Jazeera. Egypt is part of the Arab world and any place in the Arab world is your home said Reda Sada ElHafnawy a member of the Shura Councils Human Rights Committee and the political wing of the Muslim Brotherhood.  Facts about Arabs and the Arab World. Arab American AntiDiscrimination Committee. 29 November 2009. The Arab World consists of 22 countries in the Middle East and North Africa Algeria Bahrain the Comoros Islands Djibouti Egypt Iraq Jordan Kuwait Lebanon Libya Morocco Mauritania Oman Palestine Qatar Saudi Arabia Somalia Sudan Syria Tunisia the United Arab Emirates and Yemen.  Egypt country profile. BBC. Egypt is the largest Arab country and has played a central role in Middle Eastern politics.  Copt  Definition Religion History  Facts  Britannica. www.britannica.com. Retrieved 20230816. When Egyptian Muslims later ceased to call themselves by the demonym the term became the distinctive name of the Christian minority.  Sharp Arthur G. 20110915. The Everything Guide to the Middle East Understand the people the politics and the culture of this conflicted region. Simon and Schuster. ISBN 9781440529115. they adopted the Arabic language and began calling themselves Arabs. Those who remained Christian continued to identify themselves as nonArab Egyptians or Copts.  Beach Chandler Belden 1895. The Students Cyclopaedia A Ready Reference Library for School and Home Embracing History Biography Geography Discovery Invention Arts Sciences Literature. C. B. Beach. The people with the exception of about 600000 Christians are Mohamedans. They call themselves arabs but are probably descended from the ancient Egyptians the native christians are called copts  Frank Leslies Sunday Magazine. Frank Leslies Publishing House. 1879. The fellahs though calling themselves Arabs are probably the descendants of the original inhabitants of the land more or less intermixed with othee races  Fahmy All The Pashas Men P246 quoteAs a rule Egyptians referred to as evladl Arab were not allowed to be promoted beyond the rank of yuzbasicaptain  Fahmy All The Pashas Men P 246 quoteThe names of the military ranks used in Sultan Selims army were changed since they were unfamiliar to the cadets. Moreover although according to an initial plan it was possible to promote evlad Arab  Al Khitat Al Tawfikia  Imagined Empires A History of Revolt in Egypt  Duff Gordon Letters From Egypt Luxor March 
30 th 1865 To Sir Alexander Duff Gordon  All the Pashas Men Arabic Version P 337  Al Khutat Al Maqrizia An Account of the City of Misr Today and its Description        . quote              . TranslationAccording to Ibn Radwan The greatest city in Misr now is of 4 parts Fustat Cairo. Giza and Al Jazira.  Motyl Alexander J. 2001. Encyclopedia of Nationalism Volume II. Academic Press. p. 138. ISBN 0122272307.  a b Hinnesbusch p. 93.  Taha Hussein Kwakab el Sharq August 
12 th 1933                                            ...                          qtd in Dawisha Adeed. Arab Nationalism in the Twentieth Century. Princeton University Press. 2003 p. 99  Jankowski Egypt and Early Arab Nationalism p. 246  Deighton H. S. The Arab Middle East and the Modern World International Affairs vol. xxii no. 4 October 1946 p. 519.  Makropoulou Ifigenia. PanArabism What Destroyed the Ideology of Arab Nationalism Archived 20181002 at the Wayback Machine. Hellenic Center for European Studies. January 15 2007.  Before Nasser Egypt which had been ruled by Britain since 1882 was more in favor of territorial Egyptian nationalism and distant from the panArab ideology. Egyptians generally did not identify themselves as Arabs and it is revealing that when the Egyptian nationalist leader Saad Zaghlul met the Arab delegates at Versailles in 1918 he insisted that their struggles for statehood were not connected claiming that the problem of Egypt was an Egyptian problem and not an Arab one. Makropoulou Ifigenia. Pan  Arabism What Destroyed the Ideology of Arab Nationalism Archived 20181002 at the Wayback Machine. Hellenic Center for European Studies. January 15 2007.  a b Hinnesbusch p. 94.  1971  Egypts new constitution is introduced and the country is renamed the Arab Republic of Egypt. Timeline Egypt Archived 20111004 at the Wayback Machine. BBC News Timeline Egypt  Dawisha p. 237.  Dawisha pp. 26465 267  a b Barakat p. 4.  a b Barakat p. 5.  Barakat pp. 45.  Heuser Gustav 1929. Die Personennamen der Kopten. Leipzig.cite book CS1 maint location missing publisher link  Redford Donald B 1992. Egypt Canaan and Israel in Ancient Times. Princeton University Press. p. 6. ISBN 9780691036069.  Brace C. Loring Seguchi Noriko Quintyn Conrad B. Fox Sherry C. Nelson A. Russell Manolis Sotiris K. Qifeng Pan 2006. The questionable contribution of the Neolithic and the Bronze Age to European craniofacial form. Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences of the United States of America. 103 1 242247. Bibcode20
06 PNAS..103..2
42 B. doi
10.1 0
73 pnas.0509801102. PMC 1325007. PMID 16371462.  Chicki L Nichols RA Barbujani G Beaumont MA 2002. Y genetic data support the Neolithic demic diffusion model. Proc. Natl. Acad. Sci. USA. 99 17 1100811013. Bibcode20
02 PNAS...99110
08 C. doi
10.1 0
73 pnas.162158799. PMC 123201. PMID 12167671.  Estimating the Impact of Prehistoric Admixture on the Genome of Europeans Dupanloup et al. 2004. Mbe.oxfordjournals.org. Archived from the original on 11 March 2007. Retrieved 1 May 2012.  Semino O Magri C Benuzzi G et al. May 2004. Origin Diffusion and Differentiation of YChromosome Haplogroups E and J Inferences on the Neolithization of Europe and Later Migratory Events in the Mediterranean Area 2004. Am. J. Hum. Genet. 74 5 102334. doi
10.1 086386295. PMC 1181965. PMID 15069642.  CavalliSforza 1997. Paleolithic and Neolithic lineages in the European mitochondrial gene pool. Am J Hum Genet. 61 1 24754. doi
10.1 0
16 S0002929707643031. PMC 1715849. PMID 9246011. Retrieved 1 May 2012.  Chikhi 21 July 1998. Clines of nuclear DNA markers suggest a largely Neolithic ancestry of the European gene. PNAS. 95 15 90539058. Bibcode19
98 PNAS...
95.9 0
53 C. doi
10.1 0
73 pnas.
95.1 
5.9 053. PMC 21201. PMID 9671803.  Zvelebil M. 1986. Hunters in Transition Mesolithic Societies and the Transition to Farming. Cambridge UK Cambridge University Press. pp. 515 167188.  Bellwood P. 2005. First Farmers The Origins of Agricultural Societies. Malden MA Blackwell.  Dokldal M. Broek J. 1961. Physical Anthropology in Czechoslovakia Recent Developments. Current Anthropology. 2 5 455477. doi
10.1 086200228. S
2 CID 161324951.  Zvelebil M. 1989. On the transition to farming in Europe or what was spreading with the Neolithic a reply to Ammerman 1989. Antiquity. 63 239 379383. doi
10.1 0
17 S00035
98 X00076110. S
2 CID 162882505.  Ehret Christopher 20 June 2023. Ancient Africa A Global History to 300 CE. Princeton Princeton University Press. pp. 8285. ISBN 9780691244099.  Zakrzewski Sonia R. April 2007. Population continuity or population change Formation of the ancient Egyptian state. American Journal of Physical Anthropology. 132 4 501509. doi
10.1 0
02 ajpa.20569. PMID 17295300.  There is no evidence no archaeological signal for a mass migration settler colonization into Egypt from southwest Asia at the time of the writing. Core Egyptian culture was well established. A total peopling of Egypt at this time from the Near East would have meant the mass migration of Semitic speakers. The ancient Egyptian language  using the usual academic language taxonomy  is a branch within Afroasiatic with one member not counting place of originurheimat is within Africa using standard linguistic criteria based on the locale of greatest diversity deepest branches and least moves accounting for its five or six branches or sevem if Ongota is counted. Keita S. O. Y. September 2022. Ideas about Race in Nile Valley Histories A Consideration of Racial Paradigms in Recent Presentations on Nile Valley Africa from Black Pharaohs to Mummy Genomest. Journal of Ancient Egyptian Interconnections.  Wengrow David Dee Michael Foster Sarah Stevenson Alice Ramsey Christopher Bronk March 2014. Cultural convergence in the Neolithic of the Nile Valley a prehistoric perspective on Egypts place in Africa. Antiquity. 88 339 95111. doi
10.1 0
17 S00035
98 X00050249. ISSN 00035
98 X. S
2 CID 49229774.  Redford Donald 2001. Smith Tyson Stuart.The Oxford encyclopedia of ancient Egypt. Oxford University Press. pp. 2728. ISBN 9780195102345.  Trombetta B. Cruciani F. Sellitto D. Scozzari R. 2011. Trombetta B Cruciani F Sellitto D Scozzari R. A new topology of the human Y chromosome haplogroup E
1 b1 EP2 revealed through the use of newly characterized binary polymorphisms. PLOS ONE. 6 1 e16073. doi
10.1 3
71 journal.pone.0016073. PMC 3017091. PMID 21253605.  Fulvio Cruciani and others Tracing Past Human Male Movements in NorthernEastern Africa and Western Eurasia New Clues from YChromosomal Haplogroups EM78 and JM12 Molecular Biology and Evolution Volume 24 Issue 6 June 2007 Pages 13001311.  Anselin Alain H. Stiebing 2011. Egypt in its African context  proceedings of the conference held at the Manchester Museum University of Manchester 24 October 2009. Oxford Archaeopress. pp. 4354. ISBN 9781407307602.  Jr William H. Stiebing Helft Susan N. 3 July 2023. Ancient Near Eastern History and Culture. Taylor  Francis. pp. 209212. ISBN 9781000880663.  Keita Shomarka. 2022. Ancient Egyptian Origins and Identity In Ancient Egyptian society  challenging assumptions exploring approaches. Abingdon Oxon. pp. 111122. ISBN 9780367434632.cite book CS1 maint location missing publisher link  Ehret Christopher 20 June 2023. Ancient Africa A Global History to 300 CE. Princeton University Press. pp. 97 167. ISBN 9780691244105.  Batrawi A 1945. The racial history of Egypt and Nubia Pat I. J Roy Anthropol Inst 7581102.  Batrawi A. 1946. The racial history of Egypt and Nubia Part II. J Roy Anthropol Inst 76131156.  Keita SOY 1990. Studies of ancient crania from northern Africa. Am J Phys Anthropol. 83 1 3548. doi
10.1 0
02 ajpa.1330830105. PMID 2221029.  Keita SOY 1992. Further studies of crania from ancient northern Africa an analysis of crania from First Dynasty Egyptian tombs. Am J Phys Anthropol. 87 3 245254. doi
10.1 0
02 ajpa.1330870302. PMID 1562056.  Berry AC Berry RJ Ucko PJ 1967. Genetical change in ancient Egypt. Man. 2 4 551568. doi
10.2 3072799339. JSTOR 2799339.  Brace CL Tracer DP Yaroch LA Robb J Brandt K Nelson AR 1993. Clines and clusters versus race a test in ancient Egypt and the case of a death on the Nile. Yearbook of Physical Anthropology. 36 131. doi
10.1 0
02 ajpa.1330360603.  Irish JD 2006. Who were the ancient Egyptians Dental affinities among Neolithic through postdynastic peoples. Am J Phys Anthropol. 129 4 52943. doi
10.1 0
02 ajpa.20261. PMID 16331657.  Keita SOY and Rick A. Kittles. The Persistence of Racial Thinking and the Myth of Racial Divergence. American Anthropologist Vol. 99 No. 3 Sep. 1997 pp. 534544  Keita S. O. Y. November 2005. Early Nile Valley Farmers From ElBadari Aboriginals or EuropeanAgroNostratic Immigrants Craniometric Affinities Considered With Other Data. Journal of Black Studies. 36 2 191208. doi
10.1 1770021934704265912. ISSN 00219347. S
2 CID 144482802. Archived from the original on 20221018. Retrieved 20221227.  Keita 1992 p. 251  Brace C. L. Tracer D. P. Yaroch L. A. Robb J. Brandt K. Nelson A. R. 1993. Clines and clusters versus Race a test in ancient Egypt and the case of a death on the Nile. American Journal of Physical Anthropology. 36 131. doi
10.1 0
02 ajpa.1330360603.  Arredi B Poloni E Paracchini S Zerjal T Fathallah D Makrelouf M Pascali V Novelletto A TylerSmith C 2004. A Predominantly Neolithic Origin for YChromosomal DNA Variation in North Africa. Am J Hum Genet. 75 2 33845. doi
10.1 086423147. PMC 1216069. PMID 15202071.  Manni F Leonardi P Barakat A Rouba H Heyer E Klintschar M McElreavey K QuintanaMurci L 2002. Ychromosome analysis in Egypt suggests a genetic regional continuity in Northeastern Africa. Hum Biol. 74 5 64558. doi
10.1 3
53 hub.20
02.0 054. PMID 12495079. S
2 CID 26741827.  Yurco Frank SepOct 1989. Were the Ancient Egyptians Black or White. BAR Magazine.  Taha Tarek Elzalabany Sagy Fawzi Sahar Hisham Ahmed Amer Khaled Shaker Olfat 20200801. Allele frequency comparative study between the two main Egyptian ethnic groups. Forensic Science International. 313 110348. doi
10.1 0
16 j.forsciint.20
20.1 10348. ISSN 03790738. PMID 32521421. S
2 CID 219586129. Archived from the original on 20210603. Retrieved 20210531.  Irish pp. 1011  Schuenemann Verena Peltzer Alexander Welte Beatrix 30 May 2017. Ancient Egyptian mummy genomes suggest an increase of SubSaharan African ancestry in postRoman periods. Nature Communications. 8 15694. Bibcode20
17 NatCo...8156
94 S. doi
10.1 0
38 ncomms15694. PMC 5459999. PMID 28556824.  Eltis David Bradley Keith R. Perry Craig Engerman Stanley L. Cartledge Paul Richardson David 12 August 2021. The Cambridge World History of Slavery Volume 2 AD 5
00 AD 1420. Cambridge University Press. p. 150. ISBN 9780521840675. Archived from the original on 5 April 2023. Retrieved 19 March 2023.  a b c Gad Yehia 2020. Maternal and paternal lineages in King Tutankhamuns family. Guardian of Ancient Egypt Essays in Honor of Zahi Hawass. Czech Institute of Egyptology. pp. 497518. ISBN 9788073089795.  Gad Yehia 2020. Insights from ancient DNA analysis of Egyptian human mummies clues to disease and kinship. Human Molecular Genetics. 30 R1 R
24 R28. doi
10.1 0
93 hmgddaa223. PMID 33059357. Archived from the original on 2 May 2021. Retrieved 19 December 2022.  Luis JR Rowold DJ Regueiro M Caeiro B Cinniolu C Roseman C Underhill PA CavalliSforza LL Herrera RJ March 2004. The Levant versus the Horn of Africa evidence for bidirectional corridors of human migrations. American Journal of Human Genetics. 74 3 53244. doi
10.1 086382286. PMC 1182266. PMID 14973781.  Human mitochondrial haplogroups and ancient DNA preservation across Egyptian history Urban et al. 2021 PDF. ISBA9 
9 th International Symposium on Biomolecular Archaeology p.126. 2021. Archived PDF from the original on 16 October 2021. Retrieved 14 January 2023. In a previous study we assessed the genetic history of a single site Abusir elMeleq from 1388 BCE to 426 CE. We now focus on widening the geographic scope to give a general overview of the population genetic background focusing on mitochondrial haplogroups present among the whole Egyptian Nile River Valley. We collected 81 tooth hair bone and soft tissue samples from 14 mummies and 17 skeletal remains. The samples span approximately 4000 years of Egyptian history and originate from six different excavation sites covering the whole length of the Egyptian Nile River Valley. NGS 127 based ancient DNA 8 were applied to reconstruct 18 highquality mitochondrial genomes from 10 different individuals. The determined mitochondrial haplogroups match the results from our Abusir elMeleq study.  Candelora Danielle 31 August 2022. Candelora Danielle BenMarzouk Nadia Cooney Kathyln eds.. Ancient Egyptian society  challenging assumptions exploring approaches. Abingdon Oxon. pp. 101111. ISBN 9780367434632.cite book CS1 maint location missing publisher link  Hawass Zahi Gad Yehia Z. Ismail Somaia Khairat Rabab Fathalla Dina Hasan Naglaa Ahmed Amal Elleithy Hisham Ball Markus Gaballah Fawzi Wasef Sally Fateen Mohamed Amer Hany Gostner Paul Selim Ashraf 20100217. Ancestry and Pathology in King Tutankhamuns Family. JAMA. 303 7 638647. doi
10.1 0
01 jama.20
10.1 21. ISSN 00987484. PMID 20159872.  Hawass Zahi et al. 2012. Revisiting the harem conspiracy and death of Ramesses III anthropological forensic radiological and genetic study. BMJ. 345 e8268 e8268. doi
10.1 1
36 bmj.e8268. hdl1007262081. PMID 23247979. S
2 CID 206896841.  Keita S. O. Y. September 2022. Ideas about Race in Nile Valley Histories A Consideration of Racial Paradigms in Recent Presentations on Nile Valley Africa from Black Pharaohs to Mummy Genomest. Journal of Ancient Egyptian Interconnections. Archived from the original on 20221116. Retrieved 20221116.  Ehret Christopher 20 June 2023. Ancient Africa A Global History to 300 CE. Princeton Princeton University Press. pp. 8386. ISBN 9780691244099. Archived from the original on 22 March 2023. Retrieved 20 March 2023.  Hammarn Rickard Goldstein Steven T. Schlebusch Carina M. 20231108. Eurasian backmigration into Northeast Africa was a complex and multifaceted process. PLOS ONE. 18 11 e0290423. Bibcode20
23 PLoSO..18904
23 H. doi
10.1 3
71 journal.pone.0290423. ISSN 19326203. PMC 10631636. PMID 37939042.  In the ancient Egyptian language the same word meant person and Egyptian Outsiders were all thought to be somewhat inferior but that was because of their cultures not their skin colors. Bibliographyedit Barakat Halim 1993. The Arab World Society Culture and State. University of California Press. ISBN 0520084276. Egyptian identity Arab. Hinnebusch Raymond A. 2002. The Foreign Policies of Middle East States. Lynne Rienner Publishers. ISBN 1588260208. Egyptian identity Arab. Further readingedit Wikimedia Commons has media related to People of Egypt. Edward William Lane 1837. An account of the manners and customs of the modern Egyptians written in Egypt during the years 1833 34 and 35 partly from notes made during a former visit to that country in the years 1825 26 27 and 28. Vol. 1 of An Account of the Manners and Customs of the Modern Egyptians. C. Knight and co. Retrieved 20110706. v t e Demographics of Egypt Religions Islam Sunni Shia Ismailis Christianity Oriental Orthodox Eastern Orthodox Catholicism Protestant Judaism Main groups Egyptians Saidis Coptic Christians Nubians Minorities and Foreign nationals Americans Armenians Albanians Beja Bedouin Chinese Circassians Filipinos Greeks Indians Italians Japanese Koreans Magyarab Malays Roma Romani Sudanese SyroLebanese Siwis Turkic Palestinians v t e Egypt topics History Chronology Prehistoric Ancient topics Achaemenid 
27 th Dynasty 
31 st Dynasty Ptolemaic Battle of Actium Lighthouse of Alexandria Roman Diocese of Egypt Library of Alexandria Christian Sassanid Muslim Rashidun Caliphate Fustat Islamization Tulunid dynasty Ikhshidid dynasty Fatimid Caliphate Crusader invasions Ayyubid dynasty Mamluk Sultanate Mamluk Ottoman Ottoman Egypt Khedivate and Kingdom of Egypt Muhammad Ali dynasty Nahda Khedivate EgyptianEthiopian War Urabi revolt Modern French occupation Revolt of Cairo British occupation 1919 revolution World War II Sultanate Kingdom 1948 ArabIsraeli War Republic Nasser era 1952 Egyptian revolution Land reform Suez Crisis United Arab Republic SixDay War Sadat era Yom Kippur War EgyptianLibyan War Assassination of Anwar Sadat Mubarak era 20
10 s Crisis 2011 Egyptian revolution 2013 Rabaa massacre By topic Anarchism Capital Cigarette industry Constitution Copts Genetic Healthcare Jews Muslim Brotherhood 19281938 19391954 19
54 present Parliament Population Postal Saladin Timekeeping devices By city Alexandria Cairo Port Said Geography Biota Borders Cities Climate Deserts Earthquakes Environmental issues Fossils Geology Halfaya Pass Islands Lakes Mountains Mount Sinai Nile Delta Northern coast Oases Qattara Depression Red Sea Riviera Rivers Nile Sinai Peninsula Suez Canal Towns and villages Wadis Wildlife Politics Administrative divisions Governorates Civil Code Conflicts Corruption Conscription Constitution Elections Foreign relations Missions Islamic extremism Judiciary Law enforcement Massacres Military Supreme Council Nationality law Parliament Passport Political parties President list Prime Minister list Proposed new capital Refugees of the Syrian civil war Terrorism Terrorism and tourism Twin towns and sister cities Economy Agriculture Banking National Bank Companies Economic regions Egyptian stock exchange Egyptian pound Energy Entrepreneurship policies Fishing Impact on the environment Lighthouses Military industry Mining Mines Nuclear program Power stations Aswan Dam Role of the Egyptian Armed Forces Tallest buildings Telecommunications Internet Tourism Cultural tourism Transport Airlines Airports Railway stations Water supply and sanitation Water resources management Society General Abortion Animal welfare Billionaires Cannabis Capital punishment Censuses Corruption Crime Human trafficking Mass sexual assault Rape Demographics Diaspora Education Academic grading Law schools Medical schools Schools Universities Families Abaza family Feminism Gender inequality Health Healthcare Hospitals Housing Human rights Freedom of religion LGBT rights International rankings Languages Egyptian Arabic Saidi Arabic Sign Language Liberalism Literature Prostitution Religion Bah Blasphemy law Christianity Catholic dioceses Coptic Churches Hinduism Identification card controversy Irreligion Islam Ahmadiyya Mosques Niqb Judaism Synagogues Scientology Smoking Units of measurement Vehicle registration plates Waste management Women Culture Architecture Art ancient Art contemporary Botanical gardens Castles Cinema Coat of arms Cuisine Beer Wine Films Flag list regions Football Football clubs Football stadiums Egyptians Mass media Magazines Newspapers Radio TV Museums Music National anthem Olympics Public holidays World Heritage Sites Category Portal WikiProject Commons Authority control databases National France BnF data Israel United States Czech Republic Retrieved from httpsen.wikipedia.orgwindex.phptitleEgyptiansoldid1222359952 Categories Egyptian people Ethnic groups in Egypt Ethnic groups in the Middle East North African people Hidden categories Pages using the WikiHiero extension Webarchive template wayback links CS1 Arabiclanguage sources ar CS1 Italianlanguage sources it CS1 Hebrewlanguage sources he CS1 maint location missing publisher Articles with short description Short description is different from Wikidata Related ethnic groups needing confirmation Articles using infobox ethnic group with image parameters Articles containing Arabiclanguage text Pages with Arabic IPA Articles containing Egyptian Arabiclanguage text Pages with Egyptian Arabic IPA Articles containing Copticlanguage text Articles containing Ancient Greek to 14
53 language text All articles with unsourced statements Articles with unsourced statements from March 2023 Articles with unsourced statements from August 2015 All articles with specifically marked weaselworded phrases Articles with specifically marked weaselworded phrases from September 2021 Articles needing more viewpoints from August 2023 Articles with unsourced statements from August 2023 Articles with unsourced statements from October 2019 Pages with plain IPA Commons category link is on Wikidata CS1 long volume value Articles with BNF identifiers Articles with BNFdata identifiers Articles with J
9 U identifiers Articles with LCCN identifiers Articles with NKC identifiers This page was last edited on 5 May 2024 at 1539 UTC. Text is available under the Creative Commons AttributionShareAlike License 
4.0  additional terms may apply. By using this site you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation Inc. a nonprofit organization. Privacy policy About Wikipedia Disclaimers Contact Wikipedia Code of Conduct Developers Statistics Cookie statement Mobile view Toggle limited content width